










 













 













 




Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 29, 2017 1:47 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund



Snapshot People




Company Overview
IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund is an open-ended multi-asset mutual fund launched and managed by International Value Advisers, LLC. The fund invests in the public equity, fixed income, and commodity markets of countries across the globe. For its equity portion, it invests in stocks of companies operating across diversified sectors. The fund invests in value stocks of companies across all market capitalizations. For its fixed income portion, it invests in notes, bills and debentures, bank debt obligations and structured notes, high-yield debt securities, convertible securities, and securities issued by supranational organizations and sovereign debt securities. For its commodity porti...
IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund is an open-ended multi-asset mutual fund launched and managed by International Value Advisers, LLC. The fund invests in the public equity, fixed income, and commodity markets of countries across the globe. For its equity portion, it invests in stocks of companies operating across diversified sectors. The fund invests in value stocks of companies across all market capitalizations. For its fixed income portion, it invests in notes, bills and debentures, bank debt obligations and structured notes, high-yield debt securities, convertible securities, and securities issued by supranational organizations and sovereign debt securities. For its commodity portion, the fund invests in precious metals, primarily through gold bullion and gold mining securities. It employs fundamental analysis with a bottom-up security selection approach focusing on factors like fundamental value, financial strength, and stability to create its portfolio. The fund benchmarks the performance of its portfolio against the MSCI All-Country World Index (Net). It employs in-house research to create its portfolio. IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund was formed on October 1, 2008 and is domiciled in the United States.
Detailed Description


717 Fifth Avenue10th FloorNew York, NY 10022United StatesFounded in 2008



Phone: 212-584-3570

Fax: 212-584-3583

www.ivafunds.com/us-investors/mutual-funds/worldwide-fund







Key Executives for IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund




Mr. Charles Edouard de Lardemelle CFA


      	Portfolio Manager
      








Mr. Charles-Louis Jean-Marie de Vaulx


      	Portfolio Manager
      


Age: 56
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact IVA Fiduciary Trust - IVA Worldwide Fund, please visit www.ivafunds.com/us-investors/mutual-funds/worldwide-fund.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























IVA Fiduciary Trust: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























iva fiduciary trust
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
Iva Fiduciary Trust was founded in 2008. The company's line of business includes the management of funds, trusts, and foundations organized for purposes other than religious, educational, charitable, or nonprofit research.




Corporate Information
Address:

645 Madison Ave Fl 12
New York, NY 10022
United States


Phone:
1-212-584-3582


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.ivafunds.com























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data
















































Iva Fiduciary Trust in New York, NY - (212) 584-3582





























 

Enter company name












Home


Favorites


Lists


Employers by Major


Employ Veterans


Locations


Blog


Sign In





















                            The Most Advanced Company Information Database
                        





















 








Enter company name



Op. city,state,zip,county














 






Companies

 




Lists






 








Enter company name



Op. city,state,zip,county














 






Companies

 




Industries

 
 




Lists















Home

 




My Favorites
My Favorites





Lists





List Builder





Employers by Major





Employ Veterans





Locations





Industries





Blogs







X
You must be a subscriber!


This feature is available to paying subscribers only. 

Click here to learn about our subscription plans.
            



















Iva Fiduciary Trust

























Action 


Add to List
Add to Favorites
Share
































        Contact Information
    




Iva Fiduciary Trust



717 5th Ave
New York, NY 10022






Contact:
Charles De Vaulx


Title:
Principal


Phone:


                        212-584-3582
                    



Website:







There are 

50
                Companies located at 717 5th Ave, New York, NY 10022
            












 














            Map
        





View larger map









            Business Description
        



Iva Fiduciary Trust is located in New York, New York. This organization primarily operates in the Trusts, nec business / industry within the Holding and Other Investment Offices sector. This organization has been operating for approximately 9 years. Iva Fiduciary Trust is estimated to generate $114,039 in annual revenues, and employs approximately 2 people at this single location.









Sector:

Holding and Other Investment Offices



Category:

Trusts, nec



Industry:

Trusts, nec




SIC Code:

6733











Name:
Iva Fiduciary Trust


Year Founded:


2008






Location Type:
Single


Revenue:

$ 114,039



Employees:

2



Facility Size:

N/A



* Revenue & Employees are estimates









Demographics for Zipcode 10022






Percentage Population



28,038
White
1,729
Hispanic
701
Black
3,202
Asian
76
Native American
43
Hawaiian
411
Other


87.8 %
White
5.4 %
Hispanic
2.2 %
Black
10.0 %
Asian
0.2 %
Native American
0.1 %
Hawaiian
1.3 %
Other













Population




Population 
31,924




Female54.6%17,437


Male45.4%14,487




Median Age

45.3




Female45.3


Male45.3






























Questions & Answers









Where is Iva Fiduciary Trust located?





Iva Fiduciary Trust is located at 717 5th Ave, New York, NY 10022.







What are the annual sales for Iva Fiduciary Trust?





Iva Fiduciary Trust generates approximately $114,039 in annual sales.







How big is Iva Fiduciary Trust?





Iva Fiduciary Trust is estimated to generate $114,039 in annual revenues, and employs approximately 2 people at this location.









Are there other companies located at 717 5th Ave, New York, NY?





There are 50 commercial tenants at 717 5th Ave, New York, NY.







How long has Iva Fiduciary Trust been in business?





Iva Fiduciary Trust has been in business for approximately 9 years.







Is there a key contact at Iva Fiduciary Trust?





Charles De Vaulx is the Principal at Iva Fiduciary Trust. You can contact Charles at (212) 584-3582.







How many people work at Iva Fiduciary Trust?





Iva Fiduciary Trust has approximately 2 employees at this location.







What is the phone number for Iva Fiduciary Trust?





The phone number for Iva Fiduciary Trust is (212) 584-3582










 

































Generate 
More Revenue 
with 
Buzzfile 











Uncover and contact more high-value prospects in less time than with any other resource





Information on 18 million companies, 50 million contacts, 6 million buildings & 18,000 industries





Complete list of businesses in any building





Advanced search, filtering and list-building





































Nearby Resources









                        Restaurant
                    




                        Coffee
                    




                        Parking
                    






                        Hotel
                    




                        Taxi
                    




                        Pharmacy
                    






                        Bank
                    




                        Gas
                    




                        Grocery
                    


















Statistics for Zipcode 10022






Average House Value


                                $ 855,100
                            



Average Household Income


                                $ 109,625
                            



Number of Households

19,253



Persons per Household

1.62













Number of Businesses

10,618



Number of Employees

124,710



Land Area (square miles)

0.436



Water Area (square miles)

0.000



















×
Save as List






List Name





Classification

General Interest
Personal
Prospect
Trade / Industry




List Type

Companies
Places
Contacts




Description





Upload Image




X



Who can access this list?



Public - Everyone can view and edit (appears in search results)





Pre-approve members with following email domain(s):

Domains





Add







Remove





Can members edit this list?



                                    Yes
                                




                                    No
                                




                                        I will decide for each user / group
                                    



Username





Add








Remove












                                                Location
                                            







                                                    This list covers companies throughout the entire U.S.
                                                




                                                    This list covers a specific geographic area (you can select more than one state, city…)
                                                


City






County






State






Zipcode





Area Code





Add





Type
Criteria







Remove











                                                Sector, Category & Industry
                                            





                                                Control the types of companies that can be added to this list.
                                            

Sector

 



Category

 



Industry

 



SIC Code

 



Add





Type
Criteria







Remove



























Add to List






Add to Existing List












Create a new list



Cancel
Save
















×
Sign In




Not a member? Register Now 




Username





Password











                                        Remember me
                                    


Forgot Password?

















×
Subscriber Not Found




Not a subscriber? Contact Buzzfile Now.



                        We could not locate a subscriber with that email or username.
                        Try signing in with a different username or email, or Telecom support at [email protected] or 212-913-9151.
                    




Username





Password





















Remove Company Confirmation



I confirm that I, , with email address  am an owner, employee or representative, with authorization to approve the removal of the profile for:




I authorize Buzzfile to release my contact and other pertinent information to the necessary parties should this removal be contested.
I am requesting to remove this company profile.


Dear , 
Your request to remove the company profile has been denied for:




You are only permitted to claim ownership and remove one company profile. You have previously claimed ownership and removed the profile for:




You can contact us at [email protected] with any questions.



Cancel


















About Us


Partnerships


Terms of Use


Privacy Policy


Remove Company


Contact Us







 
 






















 
 




        Copyright © 2017 Buzzfile Media LLC. All Rights Reserved.
    

            45 Broadway, Ste 1420, New York, NY 10006
        












×
Error








Close










Alert






Close






























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Iva Fiduciary Trust in New York, NY 10022 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» New York
» New York
» Portfolio Management & Investment Services
» Iva Fiduciary Trust













Iva Fiduciary Trust


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





645 Madison Ave Fl 12  New York, New York 10022


(212) 584-3582


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Iva Fiduciary Trust is located at the address 645 Madison Ave Fl 12 in New York, New York 10022.  They can be contacted via phone at (212) 584-3582 for pricing, hours and directions.  Iva Fiduciary Trust has an annual sales volume of 501K - 999,999.  .For maps and directions to Iva Fiduciary Trust view the map to the right.  For reviews of Iva Fiduciary Trust see below.










Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (212) 584-3582
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 1 To 4
Exact Employee Count: 2
Exact Sales Volume: 120000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 501K - 999,999
CATEGORIES:


Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Trust, Fiduciary & Custody Activities
Finance
Investments & Securities



People Also Viewed


Ashmore Investment Mgmt Ltd


45 Rockefeller Plz  New York, New York 10111




IRG


11 Stone st Fl 3 3 Fl New York, New York 10004




Vasiliou & Co


2 Sutton Pl S  New York, New York 10022




Bank Of Montreal


3 Times Sq  New York, New York 10036




Condura Financial


14 Wall St  New York, New York 10005




E1 Asset Management, Inc.


44 Wall st Ste 901  New York, New York 10005





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM















SEC Info - IVA Fiduciary Trust - ‘497’ on 9/26/08











SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




IVA Fiduciary Trust – ‘497’ on 9/26/08On:  Friday, 9/26/08, at 5:11pm ET   ·   Effective:  9/26/08   ·   Accession #:  1104659-8-60753   ·   File #:  333-151800
Previous ‘497’:  ‘497’ on 9/25/08   ·   Next:  ‘497’ on 10/23/08   ·   Latest:  ‘497’ on 4/10/17



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

 9/26/08  IVA Fiduciary Trust               497         9/26/08    1:517K                                   Merrill Corp-MD/FA
          → IVA International Fund ⇒ Class A: IVIOX – Class C: IVICX – Class I: IVIQX
          → IVA Worldwide Fund ⇒ Class A: IVWAX – Class C: IVWCX – Class I: IVWIXF-->Definitive Material   —   Rule 497Filing Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: 497         Definitive Material                                 HTML    409K 

D-->H-->This is an HTML Document rendered as filed.  [ Alternative Formats ]


P-->

 

 
IVA FUNDS
 
STATEMENT OF ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
 
October 1, 2008
 
IVA Worldwide Fund
 
IVA International Fund
 

 
645 Madison Avenue
New York, NY 10022
(866) 941-4482  
 

 
IVA Fiduciary Trust consists of IVA Worldwide Fund (the “Worldwide Fund”)
and IVA International Fund (the “International Fund”) (each, a “Fund” and,
together, the “Funds”).
 
Each of the Worldwide Fund and the International Fund is an investment
portfolio of IVA Fiduciary Trust, an open-end series management investment
company organized as a Massachusetts Business Trust.
 
This Statement of Additional Information (“SAI”) is not a prospectus
and is only authorized for distribution when preceded or accompanied by the
Funds’ current prospectus dated October 1, 2008, as supplemented from time to
time (the “Prospectus”).  This SAI
supplements and should be read in conjunction with the Prospectus, a copy of
which may be obtained without charge by writing the Funds at the address, or by
calling the toll-free telephone number, listed above.  The Prospectus is incorporated by reference
into this Statement of Additional Information.
 




 
IVA FUNDS
 
IVA Worldwide Fund
IVA International Fund
 
CONTENTS
 



INVESTMENT OBJECTIVES, POLICIES AND
  RESTRICTIONS  


2




 


 




Investment Objectives of the Funds


2




 


 




Principal Investment Strategies and Risks
  of the Funds


2




 


 




Investment Restrictions


19




 


 




PERFORMANCE


21




 


 




MANAGEMENT OF THE FUNDS


22




 


 




INVESTMENT ADVISORY AND OTHER SERVICES


25




 


 




PROXY VOTING POLICIES AND PROCEDURES


28




 


 




SECURITIES RATINGS


28




 


 




DISTRIBUTOR


30




 


 




REVENUE SHARING


31




 


 




COMPUTATION OF NET ASSET VALUE


32




 


 




DISCLOSURE OF PORTFOLIO HOLDINGS


34




 


 




PURCHASE, REDEMPTION AND EXCHANGE OF SHARES


35




 


 




TAX STATUS


36




 


 




PORTFOLIO TRANSACTIONS AND BROKERAGE


43




 


 




DESCRIPTION OF THE TRUST


45




 


 




OTHER INFORMATION ABOUT THE FUNDS


47




 


 




FINANCIAL STATEMENTS


49




 


 




APPENDIX A


A-1



 
i




 
INVESTMENT OBJECTIVES, POLICIES
AND RESTRICTIONS
 
The Prospectus discusses the investment
objectives of the Worldwide Fund and the International Fund, as well as the
strategies they employ to achieve those objectives.  Each of the Funds is an investment portfolio
of IVA Fiduciary Trust (the “Trust”), an open-end series management investment
company organized as a Massachusetts Business Trust on June 12, 2008. Each
Fund is a diversified portfolio. A copy of the Amended and Restated Agreement
and Declaration of Trust, as amended (the “Declaration of Trust”), which is
governed by Massachusetts law, is on file with the Secretary of The
Commonwealth of Massachusetts.  The
discussion below supplements the information set forth in the Prospectus under “Investment
Objective and Principal Investment Strategies.” References herein to the
Adviser shall mean International Value Advisers, LLC. 
 
Investment
Objectives of the Funds
 
IVA Worldwide Fund.  The IVA Worldwide Fund will seek long-term
growth of capital by investing in a range of securities and asset classes from
markets around the world, including U.S. markets. No attempt is made to
construct a portfolio relative to a benchmark. Rather, the objective is to
achieve a positive annual return with moderate annual downside risk.
 
There is no
assurance that the Fund’s investment objective will be achieved.  Additionally, since the Fund’s investment
objective has been adopted as a non-fundamental investment policy, the Fund’s
investment objective may be changed without a vote of shareholders.
 
IVA International Fund.  The International Fund will seek long-term
growth of capital by investing in a range of securities and asset classes from
markets around the world, excluding U.S. markets. No attempt is made to
construct a portfolio relative to a benchmark. Rather, the objective is to
achieve a positive annual return with moderate annual downside risk.
 
There is no
assurance that the Fund’s investment objective will be achieved.  Additionally, since the Fund’s investment
objective has been adopted as a non-fundamental investment policy, the Fund’s
investment objective may be changed without a vote of shareholders.
 
Principal Investment Strategies and Risks of the Funds
 
IVA Worldwide Fund.  To achieve its objective, the Worldwide Fund
primarily seeks equity investments in companies of any capitalization that have
fundamental value, financial strength and stability. However, the Fund may
invest in companies with fundamental value that do not have the other
characteristics.  The Adviser, under
normal market conditions, intends to invest at least 40% but no less than 30%
of the Fund’s total assets in equity and debt securities issued by foreign
companies and governments.
 
IVA International Fund.  To achieve its objective, the International
Fund primarily seeks equity investments in companies of any capitalization that
have fundamental value, financial strength and stability. However, the Fund may
invest in companies with fundamental value that do not have the other
characteristics.  The Adviser, under
normal market conditions, intends to invest at least 80% of the Fund’s total
assets in equity and debt securities issued by foreign companies and
governments.  The Fund may also invest in
U.S. government securities.
 
Principal
Investment Strategies
 
As part of the principal investment strategies, the Funds intend to
invest in both foreign and domestic fixed income securities and equities, as
well as precious metals.
 
The Funds may invest a maximum of 25% of total assets in precious
metals, primarily including gold bullion, silver, platinum, and palladium.  
 
Fixed income securities include bonds, notes, bills, debentures, bank
debt obligations, high-yield debt securities (commonly referred to as “junk-bonds”),
preferred stock, convertible securities, loan participations and assignments, Rule 144A
securities, structured notes, securities issued by supranational organizations, and
sovereign debt securities. 
 
The Funds will
normally invest their assets in common stocks, preferred stocks, convertible
securities, bonds, debentures, or other debt instruments, including bank loans,
of, in the case of the Worldwide Fund, U.S. and non-U.S. companies, and in the
case of the International Fund, primarily non-U.S. companies. The Funds may
invest in securities of non-U.S. issuers directly 
 
2




 
or in the form
of American Depository Receipts (“ADRs”), Global Depository Receipts (“GDRs”),
European Depository Receipts (“EDRs”), or other securities representing
underlying shares of non-U.S. issuers.
 
When deemed
appropriate by the Adviser for short term investment or defensive purposes, the
Funds may hold up to 100% of their assets in cash and equivalents including
government obligations in the local currency of any developed country including
the U.S., commercial paper and certificates of deposit. 
 
Other asset
classes with different correlations to the economy or the stock market will be
considered to provide further diversification and to seek downside protection
in a difficult stock market. These include distressed debt securities, bank
loans, real estate interests, commodities futures, municipal bonds, and auction
market preferred securities (“AMPS”).
 
Among the
types of fixed income securities in which the Funds may invest from time to
time are United States government obligations. 
United States government obligations include Treasury Notes, Bonds and
Bills which are direct obligations of the United States government backed by
the full faith and credit of the United States, and securities issued by
agencies and instrumentalities of the United States government, which may be
(i) guaranteed by the United States Treasury, such as the securities of
the Government National Mortgage Association, or (ii) supported by the
issuer’s right to borrow from the Treasury and backed by the credit of the
federal agency or instrumentality itself, such as securities of the Federal Intermediate
Land Banks, Federal Land Banks, Bank of Cooperatives, Federal Home Loan Banks,
Tennessee Valley Authority and Farmers Home Administration.
 
For all securities
that give rise to an obligation on the part of the Funds to repay an
obligation, the Funds will establish and maintain segregated accounts to cover
such obligations as agreed upon with the counterparty.
 
Principal
Investment Risks
 
Foreign
(non-U.S.) Securities. Investors should recognize that investing in the securities of non-U.S.
issuers generally, and particularly in emerging market issuers, involves
special considerations which are not typically associated with investing in
securities of U.S. issuers.  Investments
in securities of non-U.S. issuers may involve risks arising from differences
between U.S. and non-U.S. securities markets, including less volume, much
greater price volatility in and relative illiquidity of non-U.S. securities
markets, different trading and settlement practices and less governmental
supervision and regulation, from changes in currency exchange rates, from high
and volatile rates of inflation, from economic, social and political conditions
and, as with domestic multinational corporations, from fluctuating interest
rates.
 
Since most non-U.S.
securities are denominated in non-U.S. currencies or traded primarily in
securities markets in which settlements are made in non-U.S. currencies, the
value of these investments and the net investment income available for
distribution to shareholders of a Fund may be affected favorably or unfavorably
by changes in currency exchange rates or exchange control regulations. Because
a Fund may purchase securities denominated in non-U.S. currencies, a change in
the value of any such currency against the U.S. dollar will result in a change
in the U.S. dollar value of the Fund’s assets and the Fund’s income available
for distribution.  Certain of the Funds’
foreign currency transactions may give rise to ordinary income or loss, for
federal income tax purposes, to the extent such income or loss results from
fluctuations in the value of the foreign currency.
 
In addition, although a Fund’s
income may be received or realized in foreign currencies, the Fund will be
required to compute and distribute its income in U.S. dollars. Therefore, if
the value of a currency relative to the U.S. dollar declines after a Fund’s
income has been earned in that currency, translated into U.S. dollars and
declared as a dividend, but before payment of such dividend, the Fund could be
required to liquidate portfolio securities to pay such dividend. Similarly, if
the value of a currency relative to the U.S. dollar declines between the time a
Fund incurs expenses or other obligations in U.S. dollars in order to pay such
expenses in U.S. dollars will be greater than the equivalent amount in such
currency of such expenses at the time they were incurred.
 
Certain markets are in only
the earliest stages of development. 
There is also a high concentration of market capitalization and trading
volume in a small number of issuers representing a limited number of
industries, as well as a high concentration of investors and financial
intermediaries.  Many of such markets
also may be affected by developments with respect to more established markets
in the region.  Brokers in non-U.S. and
emerging market countries typically are fewer in number and less capitalized
than brokers in the United States.  These
factors, combined with the U.S. regulatory requirements for open-end investment
companies and the restrictions on foreign investment, result in potentially
fewer investment opportunities for a Fund and may have an adverse impact on the
investment performance of a Fund.
 
There generally is less
governmental supervision and regulation of exchanges, brokers and issuers in
non-U.S. countries than there is in the United States.  For example, there may be no comparable
provisions under certain non-U.S. laws to insider trading and similar investor
protection securities laws that apply with respect to securities transactions
consummated in the United States. 
Further, brokerage commissions and other transaction costs on non-U.S.
securities exchanges generally are higher than in the United States.   With respect to investments in certain
emerging market countries, archaic legal systems may have an adverse impact on
a Fund.  For example, while the potential
liability of a shareholder in a U.S. corporation with 
 
3




 
respect to acts of the
corporation is generally limited to the amount of the shareholder’s investment,
the notion of limited liability is less clear in certain emerging market
countries.  Similarly, the rights of
investors in emerging market companies may be more limited than those of
shareholders of U.S. corporations.
 
Other investment risks
include the possible imposition of foreign withholding taxes on certain amounts
of a Fund’s income which may reduce the net return on non-U.S. investments as
compared to income received from a U.S. issuer, the possible seizure or
nationalization of foreign assets and the possible establishment of exchange
controls, expropriation, confiscatory taxation, other foreign governmental laws
or restrictions which might affect adversely payments due on securities held by
a Fund, the lack of extensive operating experience of eligible foreign
subcustodians and legal limitations on the ability of a Fund to recover assets
held in custody by a foreign subcustodian in the event of the subcustodian’s
bankruptcy.  Moreover, brokerage
commissions and other transactions costs on non-U.S. securities exchanges are
generally higher than in the United States.
 
In addition, there may be
less publicly-available information about a non-U.S. issuer than about a U.S.
issuer, and non-U.S. issuers may not be subject to the same accounting,
auditing and financial record-keeping standards and requirements as U.S.
issuers.  In particular, the assets and
profits appearing on the financial statements of an emerging market country
issuer may not reflect its financial position or results of operations in the
way they would be reflected had the financial statements been prepared in
accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.  In addition, for an issuer that keeps
accounting records in local currency, inflation accounting rules may
require, for both tax and accounting purposes, that certain assets and
liabilities be restated on the issuer’s balance sheet in order to express items
in terms of currency of constant purchasing power.  Inflation accounting may indirectly generate
losses or profits.  Consequently,
financial data may be materially affected by restatements for inflation and may
not accurately reflect the real condition of those issuers and securities
markets.  Finally, in the event of a
default of any such foreign obligations, it may be more difficult for a Fund to
obtain or enforce a judgment against the issuers of such obligations.  The manner in which foreign investors may
invest in companies in certain emerging market countries, as well as
limitations on such investments, also may have an adverse impact on the
operations of a Fund.  For example, the
Fund may be required in certain of such countries to invest initially through a
local broker or other entity and then have the shares purchased re-registered
in the name of the Fund.  Re-registration
may in some instances not be able to occur on a timely basis, resulting in a
delay during which the Fund may be denied certain of its rights as an investor.
 
Non-U.S.
markets have different clearance and settlement procedures, and in certain
markets there have been times when settlements have failed to keep pace with
the volume of securities transactions, making it difficult to conduct such
transactions.  Further, satisfactory
custodial services for investment securities may not be available in some
countries having smaller, emerging capital markets, which may result in a Fund
incurring additional costs and delays in transporting and custodying such
securities outside such countries. Delays in settlement or other problems could
result in periods when assets of a Fund are uninvested and no return is earned
thereon.  The inability of a Fund to make
intended security purchases due to settlement problems or the risk of
intermediary counterparty failures could cause a Fund to miss attractive
investment opportunities.  The inability
to dispose of a portfolio security due to settlement problems could result
either in losses to a Fund due to subsequent declines in the value of such
portfolio security or, if the Fund has entered into a contract to sell the
security, could result in possible liability to the purchaser.
 
Illiquid
Assets and Restricted Securities.  Each Fund may hold up to 15% of its
respective net assets in illiquid securities, including certain securities that
are subject to legal or contractual restrictions on resale (“restricted
securities”).  When a Fund’s holdings in
illiquid securities exceed 15% of net assets, the Adviser will use its best
efforts to remedy the situation as promptly as practicable under the
circumstances.  Generally, restricted
securities may be sold only in privately negotiated transactions or in a public
offering with respect to which a registration statement is in effect under the
Securities Act of 1933 (the “1933 Act”). 
Where registration is required, a Fund may be obligated to pay all or
part of the registration expenses and a considerable period may elapse between
the time of the decision to sell and the time the Fund may be permitted to sell
a security under an effective registration statement.  If, during such a period, adverse market
conditions were to develop, a Fund might obtain a less favorable price than that
which prevailed when it decided to sell. 
Restricted securities will be priced at fair value as determined in good
faith by the procedures adopted, approved and set forth by the Board of
Trustees. 
 
Notwithstanding
the above, a Fund may purchase securities that have been privately placed but
that are eligible for purchase and sale under Rule 144A under the 1933
Act.  That rule permits certain
qualified institutional buyers, such as the Funds, to trade in privately placed
securities that have not been registered for sale under the 1933 Act.  The Adviser, under the supervision of the
Board of Trustees of the Trust, will consider whether securities purchased
under Rule 144A are illiquid and thus subject to a Fund’s restriction on
investing in illiquid securities.  A
determination as to whether a Rule 144A security is liquid or not is a
factual issue requiring an evaluation of a number of factors.  In making this determination, the Adviser
will consider the trading markets for the specific security, taking into account
the unregistered nature of a Rule 144A 
 
4




 
security.  In addition, the Adviser could consider (1) the
frequency of trades and quotes, (2) the number of dealers and potential
purchasers, (3) the dealer undertakings to make a market, and (4) the
nature of the security and of market place trades (e.g., the time needed to
dispose of the security, the method of soliciting offers and the mechanics of
transfer).  The liquidity of Rule 144A
securities would be monitored and if, as a result of changed conditions, it is
determined that a Rule 144A security is no longer liquid, a Fund’s
holdings of illiquid securities would be reviewed to determine what steps, if
any, are required to assure that the Fund does not invest more than the maximum
percentage of its assets in illiquid securities.
 
Investing in Rule 144A
securities could have the effect of increasing the amount of a Fund’s assets
invested in illiquid securities if qualified institutional buyers are unwilling
to purchase such securities.  Because the
liquidity or illiquidity of a security depends on various factors, other types
of restricted securities also may be determined to be liquid under largely the
same type of analysis and process as is applied in respect of Rule 144A.
 
Liquidity Risk
is the risk that the value of a security will fall if trading in the security
is limited or absent.  Liquidity risk
also refers to the possibility that the Fund may not be able to sell a
security, or close out an investment contract, when it wants to.
 
Precious
Metals. The Funds may invest a maximum of 25% of
total assets in precious metals. Precious metals at times have been subject to
substantial price fluctuations over short periods of time and may be affected
by unpredictable monetary and political policies such as currency devaluations
or revaluations, economic and social conditions within a country, trade
imbalances, or trade or currency restrictions between countries. The prices of
precious metals, however, are less subject to local and company-specific
factors than securities of individual companies. As a result, precious metals
may be more or less volatile in price than securities of companies engaged in
precious metals-related businesses. Investments in precious metals can present
concerns such as delivery, storage and maintenance, possible illiquidity, and
the unavailability of accurate market valuations. Although precious metals can
be purchased in any form, including bullion and coins, the Funds intend to
purchase only those forms of precious metals that are readily marketable and
that can be stored in accordance with custody regulations applicable to mutual
funds. A Fund may incur higher custody and transaction costs for precious
metals than for securities.  Also,
precious metals investments do not pay income.
 
For a Fund to
qualify as a regulated investment company under current federal tax law, gains
from selling precious metals may not exceed 10% of the Fund’s gross income for
its taxable year.  This tax requirement
could cause a Fund to hold or sell precious metals or securities when it would
not otherwise do so.
 
Commodities
and Commodity Contracts. Each Fund may purchase or
sell precious metals directly or may invest in precious metal commodity
contracts and options on such contracts (metals are considered “commodities”
under the federal commodities laws). 
Investing in precious metals in this manner carries risks, as described
below. Each Fund may also invest in instruments related to precious metals,
including structured notes, securities of precious metal finance and operating
companies. The Fund’s exposure to the commodities markets may subject the Fund
to greater volatility than investments in traditional securities. The value of
commodity-linked instruments may be affected by changes in overall market
movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, and other
risks affecting a particular industry or commodity.
 
Floating
Rate, Inverse Floating Rate and Index Obligations.  Each Fund may invest in debt securities with
interest payments or maturity values that are not fixed, but float in
conjunction with (or inversely to) an underlying index or price. These
securities may be backed by sovereign or corporate issuers, or by collateral
such as mortgages. The indices and prices upon which such securities can be
based include interest rates, currency rates and commodities prices.
 
Floating rate
securities pay interest according to a coupon which is reset periodically. The
reset mechanism may be formula based, or reflect the passing through of
floating interest payments on an underlying collateral pool. Inverse floating
rate securities are similar to floating rate securities except that their
coupon payments vary inversely with an underlying index by use of a formula.
Inverse floating rate securities tend to exhibit greater price volatility than
other floating rate securities.
 
Floating rate obligations generally exhibit a low price volatility for
a given stated maturity or average life because their coupons adjust with
changes in interest rates. Interest rate risk and price volatility on inverse
floating rate obligations can be high, especially if leverage is used in the
formula. Index securities pay a fixed rate of interest, but have a maturity
value that varies by formula, so that when the obligation matures a gain or
loss may be realized. The risk of index obligations depends on the volatility
of the underlying index, the coupon payment and the maturity of the obligation.
 
Bank
Obligations. 
The Funds may invest in bank obligations, which may include bank
certificates of deposit, time deposits or bankers’ acceptances.  Certificates of deposit and time deposits are
negotiable certificates issued against funds deposited in a commercial bank for
a definite period of time and earning a specified return.  Bankers’ acceptances are negotiable drafts or

 
5




 
bills of
exchange, normally drawn by an importer or exporter to pay for specific
merchandise, which are “accepted” by a bank, meaning in effect that the bank
unconditionally agrees to pay the face value of the instrument on maturity.
 
Lower-Rated Debt Securities.  Each Fund may invest in lower-rated
fixed-income securities (commonly known as “junk bonds”).  The lower ratings reflect a greater possibility
that adverse changes in the financial condition of the issuer or in general
economic conditions, or both, or an unanticipated rise in interest rates, may
impair the ability of the issuer to make payments of interest and principal.  The inability (or perceived inability) of
issuers to make timely payment of interest and principal would likely make the
values of securities held by the Fund more volatile and could limit the Fund’s
ability to sell its securities at prices approximating the values the Fund had
placed on such securities.  In the
absence of a liquid trading market for securities held by it, the Fund at times
may be unable to establish the fair value of such securities.
 
Securities ratings are based largely on the issuer’s historical financial
condition and the rating agencies’ analysis at the time of rating.  Consequently, the rating assigned to any
particular security is not necessarily a reflection of the issuer’s current
financial condition, which may be better or worse than the rating would
indicate.  In addition, the rating
assigned to a security by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. or Standard &
Poor’s (or by any other nationally recognized securities rating agency) does
not reflect an assessment of the volatility of the security’s market value or
the liquidity of an investment in the security.
 
Like those of other fixed-income securities, the values of lower-rated
securities fluctuate in response to changes in interest rates.  A decrease in interest rates will generally
result in an increase in the value of the Fund’s fixed-income assets.  Conversely, during periods of rising interest
rates, the value of the Fund’s fixed-income assets will generally decline.  The values of lower-rated securities may
often be affected to a greater extent by changes in general economic conditions
and business conditions affecting the issuers of such securities and their
industries.  Negative publicity or
investor perceptions may also adversely affect the values of lower-rated
securities.   Changes by nationally
recognized securities rating agencies in their ratings of any fixed-income
security and changes in the ability of an issuer to make payments of interest
and principal may also affect the value of these investments.  Changes in the value of portfolio securities
generally will not affect income derived from these securities, but will affect
the Fund’s net asset value.  The Fund
will not necessarily dispose of a security when its rating is reduced below its
rating at the time of purchase.  However,
the Adviser will monitor the investment to determine whether its retention will
assist in meeting the Fund’s investment objective(s).
 
Issuers of lower-rated securities are often highly leveraged, so that
their ability to service their debt obligations during an economic downturn or
during sustained periods of rising interest rates may be impaired.  Such issuers may not have more traditional
methods of financing available to them and may be unable to repay outstanding
obligations at maturity by refinancing. 
The risk of loss due to default in payment of interest or repayment of
principal by such issuers is significantly greater because such securities
frequently are unsecured and subordinated to the prior payment of senior
indebtedness.
 
At times, a substantial portion of each Fund’s assets may be invested
in an issue of which the Fund, by itself or together with other Funds and
accounts managed by the Adviser, holds all or a major portion.  Although the Adviser generally considers such
securities to be liquid because of the availability of an institutional market
for such securities, it is possible that, under adverse market or economic
conditions or in the event of adverse changes in the financial condition of the
issuer, the Fund could find it more difficult to sell these securities when the
Adviser believes it advisable to do so or may be able to sell the securities
only at prices lower than if they were more widely held.  Under these circumstances, it may also be
more difficult to determine the fair value of such securities for purposes of
computing the Fund’s net asset value.  In
order to enforce its rights in the event of a default, the Fund may be required
to participate in various legal proceedings or take possession of and manage
assets securing the issuer’s obligations on such securities.  This could increase the Fund’s operating
expenses and adversely affect the fund’s net asset value.  In the case of tax-exempt funds, any income
derived from the fund’s ownership or operation of such assets would not be tax-exempt.  The ability of a holder of a tax-exempt
security to enforce the terms of that security in a bankruptcy proceeding may
be more limited than would be the case with respect to securities of private
issuers.  In addition, the fund’s
intention to qualify as a “regulated investment company” under the Internal
Revenue Code may limit the extent to which the fund may exercise its rights by
taking possession of such assets.
 
To the
extent each Fund invests in securities in the lower rating categories, the achievement
of the Fund’s goals is more dependent on the Adviser’s investment analysis than
would be the case if the Fund were investing in securities in the higher rating
categories.
 
Zero-Coupon
and Pay-in-Kind Securities.  The Funds may invest in zero coupon and
pay-in-kind (“PIK”) securities. Zero coupon securities are debt securities that
pay no cash income but are sold at substantial discounts from their value at
maturity. PIK securities pay all or a portion of their interest in the form of
additional debt or equity securities. Because such securities do not pay
current cash income, the price of these securities can be volatile when
interest rates fluctuate. While these securities do not pay current cash
income, federal income tax law requires the holders of zero coupon and PIK
securities to 
 
6




 
include in
income each year the portion of the original issue discount (or deemed
discount) and other non-cash income on such securities accrued during that
year.
 
Investment
in Relatively New Issuers.  Each Fund intends to invest occasionally in
the common stock of selected new issuers. Investments in relatively new
issuers, i.e., those having continuous operating histories of less than three
years, may carry special risks and may be more speculative because such
companies are relatively unseasoned. Such companies may also lack sufficient
resources, may be unable to generate internally the funds necessary for growth
and may find external financing to be unavailable on favorable terms or even
totally unavailable. Those companies will often be involved in the development
or marketing of a new product with no established market, which could lead to
significant losses. The securities of such issuers may have a limited trading
market which may adversely affect their disposition and can result in their
being priced lower than might otherwise be the case. If other investors who
invest in such issuers trade the same securities when a Fund attempts to
dispose of its holdings, the Fund may receive lower prices than might otherwise
be the case.
 
Bank Loans.
Each Fund may invest in bank loans.  By
purchasing a loan, the Fund acquires some or all of the interest of a bank or
other lending institution in a loan to a particular borrower.  The Fund may act as part of a lending
syndicate, and in such cases would be purchasing a “participation” in the
loan.  The fund may also purchase loans
by assignment from another lender.  Many
loans are secured by the assets of the borrower, and most impose restrictive
covenants which must be met by the borrower. 
These loans are typically made by a syndicate of banks, represented by
an agent bank which has negotiated and structured the loan and which is responsible
generally for collecting interest, principal, and other amounts from the
borrower on its own behalf and on behalf of the other lending institutions in
the syndicate, and for enforcing its and their other rights against the
borrower.  Each of the lending
institutions, including the agent bank, lends to the borrower a portion of the
total amount of the loan, and retains the corresponding interest in the loan.
 
Each Fund’s
ability to receive payments of principal and interest and other amounts in
connection with loan participations held by it will depend primarily on the
financial condition of the borrower (and, in some cases, the lending
institution from which it purchases the loan). 
The value of collateral, if any, securing a loan can decline, or may be
insufficient to meet the borrower’s obligations or difficult to liquidate.  In addition, the Fund’s access to collateral
may be limited by bankruptcy or other insolvency laws.  The failure by the Fund to receive scheduled
interest or principal payments on a loan would adversely affect the income of
the Fund and would likely reduce the value of its assets, which would be
reflected in a reduction in the Fund’s net asset value.  Banks and other lending institutions
generally perform a credit analysis of the borrower before originating a loan
or participating in a lending syndicate. 
In selecting the loans in which the Fund will invest, however, the
Adviser will not rely solely on that credit analysis, but will perform its own
investment analysis of the borrowers. 
The Adviser’s analysis may include consideration of the borrower’s
financial strength and managerial experience, debt coverage, additional
borrowing requirements or debt maturity schedules, changing financial
conditions, and responsiveness to changes in business conditions and interest
rates.  The Adviser will generally not
have access to non-public information to which other investors in syndicated
loans may have access.  Because loans in
which the Fund may invest are not generally rated by independent credit rating
agencies, a decision by the Fund to invest in a particular loan will depend
almost exclusively on the Adviser’s, and the original lending institution’s,
credit analysis of the borrower. 
Investments in loans may be of any quality, including “distressed”
loans, and will be subject to the Fund’s credit quality policy.  The loans in which the Fund may invest
include those that pay fixed rates of interest and those that pay floating
rates – i.e., rates that adjust periodically
based on a known lending rate, such as a bank’s prime rate.
 
Investing
directly in loans or other direct debt instruments exposes the Funds to various
risks similar to those borne by a creditor. 
Such risks include the risk of default, the risk of delayed repayment,
and the risk of inadequate collateral. 
Investments in loans are also less liquid than investment in publicly
traded securities and carry less legal protections in the event of fraud or
misrepresentation.  Unlike debt
instruments that are securities, investments in loans are not regulated by
federal securities laws or the SEC.  In
addition, loan participations involve a risk of insolvency by the lending bank
or other financial intermediary.
 
Arbitrage
Transactions. To the extent that the Fund invests
significantly in foreign securities traded on markets that close before the
Fund’s valuation time, it may be particularly susceptible to dilution as a
result of excessive trading. Because events may occur after the close of
foreign markets and before the Fund’s valuation time that influence the value
of foreign securities, investors may seek to trade Fund shares in an effort to
benefit from their understanding of the value of foreign securities as of the
Fund’s valuation time. This is often referred to as price arbitrage. The Fund
has adopted procedures designed to adjust closing market prices of foreign
securities under certain circumstances to reflect what the Fund believes to be
the fair value of those securities as of its valuation time. To the extent the
adjustments don’t work fully, investors engaging in price arbitrage may cause
dilution in the value of the Fund’s shares held by other shareholders.
 
7




 
Non-Principal Investment Strategies and Risks of the Funds
 
Non-Principal
Investment Strategies
 
The Funds may
also invest their assets in trade claims, municipal bonds, and auction market
preferred security loans, of, in the case of the Worldwide Fund, U.S. and
non-U.S. companies, and in the case of the International Fund, primarily
non-U.S. companies.
 
In addition,
the Funds may invest in currencies, warrants, options or other similar rights,
in asset-backed securities, collateralized debt or loan obligations or other “structured
securities” in which the value is linked to the price of an underlying
instrument, such as a currency, commodity or index, or purchase or sell
contracts for future delivery of commodities, currencies, indices or
securities. The Funds may invest in swaps, including rate caps, floors and
collars, credit default swap contracts, total return swaps and currency swaps,
for hedging purposes or to gain exposure to a credit which the Funds may
otherwise invest, as well as other derivative instruments, including products
that have yet to be developed. The Funds may invest in mortgage-backed and
asset-backed securities. The Funds may, subject to a number of restrictions,
hold securities issued by other investment funds or trusts as well as securities
issued by private investment funds.
 
The Funds may
enter into repurchase agreements.
 
Non-Principal
Investment Risks
 
Mortgage-Backed
Securities. Each Fund may invest in
mortgage-backed securities and derivative mortgage-backed securities, and may
also invest in “principal only” and “interest only” components. Mortgage-backed
securities are securities that directly or indirectly represent a participation
in, or are secured by and payable from, mortgage loans on real property.
 
As with other
debt securities, mortgage-backed securities are subject to credit risk and
interest rate risk. However, the yield and maturity characteristics of
mortgage-backed securities differ from traditional debt securities. A major
difference is that the principal amount of the obligations may normally be
prepaid at any time because the underlying assets (i.e., loans) generally may
be prepaid at any time. The relationship between prepayments and interest rates
may give some mortgage-backed securities less potential for growth in value
than conventional fixed-income securities with comparable maturities. In
addition, in periods of falling interest rates, the rate of prepayments tends
to increase. During such periods, the reinvestment of prepayment proceeds by
each Fund will generally be at lower rates than the rates that were carried by
the obligations that have been prepaid. If interest rates rise, borrowers may
prepay mortgages more slowly than originally expected. This may further reduce
the market value of mortgage-backed securities and lengthen their durations.
Because of these and other reasons, a mortgage-backed security’s total return,
maturity and duration may be difficult to predict precisely. Mortgage-backed
securities come in different classes that have different risks. Junior classes
of mortgage-backed securities protect the senior class investors against losses
on the underlying mortgage loans by taking the first loss if there are
liquidations among the underlying loans. Junior classes generally receive
principal and interest payments only after all required payments have been made
to more senior classes. If a Fund invests in junior classes of mortgage-related
securities, it may not be able to recover all of its investment in the
securities it purchases. In addition, if the underlying mortgage portfolio has
been overvalued, or if mortgage values subsequently decline, a Fund may suffer
significant losses.
 
Investments in
mortgage-backed securities involve the risks of interruptions in the payment of
interest and principal (delinquency) and the potential for loss of principal if
the property underlying the security is sold as a result of foreclosure on the
mortgage (default). These risks include the risks associated with direct
ownership of real estate, such as the effects of general and local economic
conditions on real estate values, the conditions of specific industry segments,
the ability of tenants to make lease payments and the ability of a property to
attract and retain tenants, which in turn may be affected by local market
conditions such as oversupply of space or a reduction of available space, the
ability of the owner to provide adequate maintenance and insurance, energy
costs, government regulations with respect to environmental, zoning, rent
control and other matters, and real estate and other taxes. If the underlying
borrowers cannot pay their mortgage loans, they may default and the lenders may
foreclose on the property. Finally, the ability of borrowers to repay mortgage
loans underlying mortgage-backed securities will typically depend upon the
future availability of financing and the stability of real estate values.
 
For mortgage
loans not guaranteed by a government agency or other party, the only remedy of
the lender in the event of a default is to foreclose upon the property. If
borrowers are not able or willing to pay the principal balance on the loans,
there is a good chance that payments on the related mortgage-related securities
will not be made. Certain borrowers on underlying 
 
8




 
mortgages may
become subject to bankruptcy proceedings, in which case the value of the
mortgage-backed securities may decline.
 
Recent
Developments with Sub-prime Mortgage Market.  Certain real estate markets have experienced
declines in prices and demand, most notably in the residential housing
market.  In addition, there have been
rising delinquency rates in highly leveraged loans to weaker borrowers,
specifically in the sub-prime mortgage sector, that have caused rising defaults
on loans.  These defaults have caused
unexpected losses for loan originators and certain sub-prime lenders.  The deteriorating situation with loans and
lenders has led to instability in capital markets associated with securities
that are linked to the sub-prime mortgage market.  These events may increase the risks
associated with investments mortgage-backed securities and asset-backed
securities. 
 
Asset-Backed
Securities. 
Each Fund may invest in asset-backed securities that, through the use of
trusts and special purpose vehicles, are securitized with various types of
assets, such as automobile receivables, credit card receivables and home-equity
loans in pass-through structures similar to the mortgage-related securities
described above.  In general, the
collateral supporting asset-backed securities is of shorter maturity than the
collateral supporting mortgage loans and is less likely to experience
substantial prepayments. However, asset-backed securities are not backed by any
governmental agency.
 
Exchange
Traded Funds (“ETFs”). Each Fund may invest in
ETFs, which are investment companies or special purpose trusts whose primary
objective is to achieve the same rate of return as a particular market index
while trading throughout the day on an exchange. The Funds will purchase and
sell individual shares of ETFs in the secondary market. These secondary market
transactions require the payment of commissions.
 
ETF shares are
subject to the same risks as other investment companies, as described
above.  Certain risks of investing in an
ETF are similar to those of investing in an indexed mutual fund, including
tracking error risk (the risk of errors in matching the ETF’s underlying assets
to the index); and the risk that because an ETF is not actively managed, it
cannot sell poorly performing stocks as long as they are represented in the
index. Other ETF risks include the risk that ETFs may trade in the secondary
market at a discount from their NAV and the risk that the ETFs may not be
liquid.  Furthermore, there may be times
when the exchange halts trading, in which case a Fund owning ETF shares would
be unable to sell them until trading is resumed.  In addition, because ETFs often invest in a
portfolio of common stocks and “track” a designated index, an overall decline
in stocks comprising an ETF’s benchmark index could have a greater impact on
the ETF and investors than might be the case in an investment company with a
more widely diversified portfolio. 
Losses could also occur if the ETF is unable to replicate the
performance of the chosen benchmark index. Other risks associated with ETFs
include the possibility that: (i) an ETF’s distributions may decline if
the issuers of the ETF’s portfolio securities fail to continue to pay
dividends; and (ii) under certain circumstances, an ETF could be
terminated.  Should termination occur,
the ETF could have to liquidate its portfolio when the prices for those assets
are falling.  In addition, inadequate or
irregularly provided information about an ETF or its investments could expose
investors in ETFs to unknown risks.
 
Exchange
Traded Notes (“ETNs”) An investment in an Exchange Traded Note
(ETN) involves risks, including possible loss of principal. ETNs are unsecured
debt securities issued by a bank that are linked to the total return of a
market index. Risks of investing in ETNs also include limited portfolio
diversification, uncertain principal payment, and illiquidity. Additionally,
the investor fee will reduce the amount of return on maturity or at redemption,
and as a result the investor may receive less than the principal amount a
maturity or upon redemption, even if the value of the relevant index has
increased. An investment in an ETN may not be suitable for all investors.
 
Structured
Investments. A structured
investment is a security having a return tied to an underlying index or other
security or asset class.  Structured
investments generally are individually negotiated agreements and may be traded
over-the-counter.  Structured investments
are organized and operated to restructure the investment characteristics of the
underlying security.  This restructuring
involves the deposit with or purchase by an entity, such as a corporation or
trust, on specified instruments (such as commercial bank loans) and the
issuance by that entity or one or more classes of securities (“structured
securities”) backed by, or representing interests in, the underlying
instruments.  The cash flow on the
underlying instruments may be apportioned among the newly issued structured
securities to create securities with different investment characteristics, such
as varying maturities, payment priorities and interest rate provisions, and the
extent of such payments made with respect to structured securities is dependent
on the extent of the cash flow on the underlying instruments.  Because structured securities typically
involve no credit enhancement, their credit risk generally will be equivalent
to that of the underlying instruments. 
Investments in structured securities are generally of a class of
structured securities that is either subordinated or unsubordinated to the
right of payment of another class. 
Subordinated structured securities typically have higher yields and
present greater risks than unsubordinated structured securities.  Structured securities are typically sold in
private placement transactions, and there currently is no active trading market
for structured securities.  Investments
in government and government-related and restructured debt instruments are
subject to special risks, including the inability or unwillingness to repay
principal and interest, requests to reschedule or restructure outstanding debt
and requests to extend additional loan amounts.
 
Certain
issuers of structured investments may be deemed to be “investment companies” as
defined in the 1940 Act.  As a result, a
Fund’s investment in these structured investments may be limited by the
restrictions contained in the 1940 Act. Structured investments are typically
sold in private placement transactions, and there currently is no active
trading market for Structured Investments.
 
9




 
Private
Investment Funds. Each Fund may invest in private
investment funds (“Hedge Funds”) managed by various investment managers (“Managers”)
that use a variety of investment strategies, including investment in other
Hedge Funds. By investing in Hedge Funds indirectly through the Fund, an
investor indirectly bears a portion of the asset-based fees, incentive-based
allocations and other expenses borne by a Fund as an investor in Hedge Funds,
in addition to the operating expenses of a Fund. The incentive-based
allocations assessed by Managers and borne directly by a Fund may create an
incentive for Managers to make investments that are riskier or more speculative
than those that might have been made in the absence of incentive-based
allocations. Because the Managers value the Hedge Funds they manage, which
directly affects the amount of incentive-based allocations they receive,
Managers face a conflict of interest in performing such valuations. Various
risks are associated with the securities and other instruments in which Hedge
Funds may invest, their investment strategies and the specialized investment
techniques they may use. Hedge Funds are not registered as investment companies
under the 1940 Act. Therefore, a Fund, as an investor in Hedge Funds, will not
have the benefit of the protections afforded by the 1940 Act to investors in
registered investment companies, such as mutual funds. To the extent a Fund
invests in a Hedge Fund that allows its investors to effect withdrawals only at
certain specified times, a Fund may not be able to withdraw its investment in
such Hedge Fund promptly after it has made a decision to do so, which may
result in a loss and adversely affect a Fund’s investment return. To the extent
a Fund invests in a Hedge Fund that is permitted to distribute securities in
kind to investors making withdrawals, upon a Fund’s withdrawal of all or a
portion of its interest in such Hedge Fund a Fund may receive securities that
are illiquid or difficult to value.
 
Investment
in Other Investment Companies.  Each Fund may invest in unaffiliated
investment funds which invest principally in securities in which that Fund is
authorized to invest.  Under the 1940
Act, a Fund may invest a maximum of 10% of its total assets in the securities
of other investment companies.  In
addition, under the 1940 Act, not more than 5% of the Fund’s total assets may
be invested in the securities of any one investment company and a Fund may not
purchase more than 3% of the outstanding voting stock of such investment
company.
 
Investing in
other investment companies involves substantially the same risks as investing
directly in the underlying securities, but may involve additional expenses at
the investment company level. To the extent a Fund invests in other investment
funds, the Fund’s shareholders will incur certain duplicative fees and
expenses, including investment advisory fees. The return on such investments
will be reduced by the operating expenses, including investment advisory and
administration fees, of such investment funds, and will be further reduced by
fund expenses, including management fees; that is, there will be a layering of
certain fees and expenses.  Investments
in investment companies also may involve the payment of substantial premiums
above the value of such companies’ portfolio securities.
 
Despite the
possibility of greater fees and expenses, investment in other investment
companies may be attractive for several reasons, especially in connection with
non-U.S. investments. Because of restrictions on direct investment by U.S.
entities in certain countries, investing indirectly in such countries (by
purchasing shares of another fund that is permitted to invest in such
countries) may be the most practical and efficient way for a Fund to invest in
such countries. In other cases, when a Fund’s portfolio manager desires to make
only a relatively small investment in a particular country, investing through
another fund that holds a diversified portfolio in that country may be more
effective than investing directly in issuers in that country. The Funds do not
intend to invest in such vehicles or funds unless the Adviser determines that
the potential benefits of such investment justify the payment of any applicable
premiums.
 
Adjustable Rate and Auction Preferred Stocks.
Typically, the dividend rate on an adjustable rate preferred stock is
determined prospectively each quarter by applying an adjustment formula
established at the time of issuance of the stock.  Although adjustment formulas vary among
issues, they typically involve a fixed premium or discount relative to rates on
specified debt securities issued by the U.S. Treasury.  Typically, an adjustment formula will provide
for a fixed premium or discount adjustment relative to the highest base yield
of three specified U.S. Treasury securities: the 90-day Treasury bill, the
10-year Treasury note and the 20-year Treasury bond.  The premium or discount adjustment to be
added to or subtracted from this highest U.S. Treasury base rate yield is fixed
at the time of issue and cannot be changed without the approval of the holders
of the stock.  The dividend rate on other
preferred stocks, commonly known as auction preferred stocks, is adjusted at
intervals that may be more frequent than quarterly, such as every 49 days,
based on bids submitted by holders and prospective purchasers of such stocks
and may be subject to stated maximum and minimum dividend rates.  The issues of most adjustable rate and
auction preferred stocks currently outstanding are perpetual, but are
redeemable after a specified date at the option of the issuer.  Certain issues supported by the credit of a
high-rated financial institution provide for mandatory redemption prior to
expiration of the credit arrangement.  No
redemption can occur if full cumulative dividends are not paid.  Although the dividend rates on adjustable and
auction preferred stocks generally are adjusted or reset frequently, the market
values of these preferred stocks still may fluctuate in response to changes in
interest rates.  Market values of
adjustable preferred stocks also may substantially fluctuate if interest rates
increase or decrease once the maximum or minimum dividend rate for a particular
stock is approached.
 
10




 
Municipal
Bonds. Municipal
bonds are debt obligations issued by the states, possessions, or territories of
the United States (including the District of Columbia) or a political
subdivision, public instrumentality, agency or other governmental unit of such
states, possessions, or territories (e.g., counties, cities, towns, villages,
districts and authorities). For example, states, possessions, territories and municipalities
may issue municipal bonds to raise funds for various public purposes such as
airports, housing, hospitals, mass transportation, schools, water and sewer
works.  They may also issue municipal
bonds to refund outstanding obligations and to meet general operating expenses.
 
Municipal
bonds may be general obligation bonds or revenue bonds.  General obligation bonds are secured by the
issuer’s pledge of its full faith, credit and taxing power for the payment of
principal and interest.  Revenue bonds are
payable from revenues derived from particular facilities, from the proceeds of
a special excise tax or from other specific revenue sources.  They are not usually payable from the general
taxing power of a municipality.
 
In addition,
certain types of “private activity” bonds may be issued by public authorities
to obtain funding for privately operated facilities, such as housing and
pollution control facilities, for industrial facilities and for water supply,
gas, electricity and waste disposal facilities. Other types of private activity
bonds are used to finance the construction, repair or improvement of, or to
obtain equipment for, privately operated industrial or commercial facilities.
Current federal tax laws place substantial limitations on the size of certain
of such issues. In certain cases, the interest on a private activity bond may
not be exempt from federal income tax or the alternative minimum tax.
 
Futures and
Options on Futures. The Funds may use interest
rate, foreign currency, index and other futures contracts.  The Funds may use options on futures
contracts. A futures contract provides for the future sale by one party and
purchase by another party of a specified quantity of the security or other
financial instrument at a specified price and time.  A futures contract on an index is an
agreement pursuant to which two parties agree to take or make delivery of an
amount of cash equal to the difference between the value of the index at the
close of the last trading day of the contract and the price at which the index
contract originally was written. 
Although the value of an index might be a function of the value of
certain specified securities, physical delivery of these securities is not
always made.  A public market exists in
futures contracts covering a number of indexes, as well as financial
instruments, including, without limitation: U.S. Treasury bonds; U.S. Treasury
notes; GNMA Certificates; three-month U.S. Treasury bills; 90-day commercial
paper; bank certificates of deposit; Eurodollar certificates of deposit; the
Australian dollar; the Canadian dollar; the British pound; the Japanese yen;
the Swiss franc; the Mexican peso; and certain multinational currencies, such
as the euro.  It is expected that other
futures contracts will be developed and traded in the future.
 
Each
Fund may purchase and write call and put futures options.  Futures options possess many of the same
characteristics as options on securities and indexes (discussed above).  A futures option gives the holder the right,
in return for the premium paid, to assume a long position (call) or short
position (put) in a futures contract at a specified exercise price upon
expiration of, or at any time during the period of, the option.  Upon exercise of a call option, the holder
acquires a long position in the futures contract and the writer is assigned the
opposite short position.  In the case of
a put option, the opposite is true.
 
When a
purchase or sale of a futures contract is made by a Fund, the Fund is required
to deposit with its futures commission merchant a specified amount of liquid
assets (“initial margin”).  The margin
required for a futures contract is set by the exchange on which the contract is
traded and may be modified during the term of the contract.  The initial margin is in the nature of a
performance bond or good faith deposit on the futures contract that is returned
to the Fund upon termination of the contract, assuming all contractual
obligations have been satisfied.  Each Fund
listed above expects to earn taxable interest income on its initial margin
deposits.  A futures contract held by a
Fund is valued daily at the official settlement price of the exchange on which
it is traded.  Each day the Fund pays or
receives cash, called “variation margin,” equal to the daily change in value of
the futures contract.  This process is
known as “marking to market.”  Variation
margin does not represent a borrowing or loan by the Fund but is instead a
settlement between the Fund and the broker of the amount one would owe the other
if the futures contract expired.  In
computing daily net asset value, each Fund will mark to market its open futures
positions.
 
Each Fund also
is required to deposit and to maintain margin with respect to put and call
options on futures contracts written by it. 
Such margin deposits will vary depending on the nature of the underlying
futures contract (and the related initial margin requirements), the current
market value of the option and other futures positions held by the Fund.
 
Although some
futures contracts call for making or taking delivery of the underlying
securities, generally these obligations are closed out prior to delivery by
offsetting purchases or sales of matching futures contracts (involving the same
exchange, underlying security or index and delivery month).  If an offsetting purchase price is less than
the original sale price, a Fund realizes a capital gain, or if it is more, the
Fund realizes a capital loss.  Conversely,
if an offsetting sale price is more than the 
 
11




 
original
purchase price, a Fund realizes a capital gain, or if it is less, the Fund
realizes a capital loss.  The transaction
costs also must be included in these calculations.
 
The
Funds may write covered straddles consisting of a call and a put written on the
same underlying futures contract.  A
straddle will be covered when sufficient assets are deposited to meet the Fund’s
immediate obligations.  Each Fund may use
the same liquid assets to cover both the call and put options if the exercise
price of the call and put are the same, or if the exercise price of the call is
higher than that of the put.  In such
cases, each Fund also will segregate liquid assets equivalent to the amount, if
any, by which the put is “in the money.”
 
Limitations
on Use of Futures and Futures Options.  When purchasing a futures contract, each Fund
will maintain with its futures commission merchant, a margin account with a
value equal to the market value of the futures contract (marked to market on a
daily basis).  Alternatively, the Fund
may “cover” its position by purchasing a put option on the same futures
contract with a strike price as high as or higher than the price of the
contract held by the Fund.
 
When selling a
futures contract, each Fund will maintain with its futures commission merchant,
a margin account with a value equal to the market value of the instruments
underlying the contract (marked to market on a daily basis).  Alternatively, the Fund may “cover” its
position by owning the instruments underlying the contract (or, in the case of
an index futures contract, a portfolio with a volatility substantially similar
to that of the index on which the futures contract is based), or by holding a
call option permitting the Fund to purchase the same futures contract at a
price no higher than the price of the contract written by the Fund.
 
When selling a
call option on a futures contract, each Fund will maintain with its futures
commission merchant, a margin account with a value equal the total market value
of the futures contract underlying the call option (marked to market on a daily
basis).  Alternatively, the Fund may “cover”
its position by entering into a long position in the same futures contract at a
price no higher than the strike price of the call option, by owning the
instruments underlying the futures contract, or by holding a separate call
option permitting the Fund to purchase the same futures contract at a price not
higher than the strike price of the call option sold by the Fund.
 
When selling a
put option on a futures contract, each Fund will maintain with its futures
commission merchant, a margin account with a value equal the purchase price of
the futures contract (marked to market on a daily basis).  Alternatively, the Fund may “cover” the
position either by entering into a short position in the same futures contract,
or by owning a separate put option permitting it to sell the same futures
contract so long as the strike price of the purchased put option is the same as
or higher than the strike price of the put option sold by the Fund.
 
The
requirements for qualification as a regulated investment company under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, also may limit the extent to which a
Fund may enter into futures, futures options or forward contracts.
 
Risks
Associated with Futures and Futures Options.  There are several risks associated with the
use of futures contracts and futures options. 
A purchase or sale of a futures contract may result in losses in excess
of the amount invested in the futures contract. 
There can be no guarantee that there will be a correlation between price
movements in the futures contracts or futures options and in the securities or
index positions covering them.  In
addition, there are significant differences between the securities and indexes
and futures markets that could result in an imperfect correlation between the
markets.  The degree of imperfection of
correlation depends on circumstances such as variations in speculative market
demand for futures and futures options on securities or indexes, including
technical influences in futures trading and futures options, and differences
between the financial instruments held by a Fund and the instruments underlying
the standard contracts available for trading in such respects as interest rate
levels, maturities and creditworthiness of issuers.  A decision as to whether, when and how to
employ futures contracts and futures options involves the exercise of skill and
judgment, and even well-conceived uses may be unsuccessful to some degree
because of market behavior or unexpected interest rate trends.
 
Futures
exchanges may limit the amount of fluctuation permitted in certain futures
contract prices during a single trading day. 
The daily limit establishes the maximum amount that the price of a
futures contract may vary either up or down from the previous day’s settlement
price at the end of the current trading session.  Once the daily limit has been reached in a
futures contract subject to the limit, no more trades may be made on that day
at a price beyond that limit.  The daily
limit governs only price movements during a particular trading day and
therefore does not limit potential losses because the limit may work to prevent
the liquidation of unfavorable positions. 
For example, futures prices have occasionally moved to the daily limit
for several consecutive trading days with little or no trading, thereby
preventing prompt liquidation of positions and subjecting some holders of
futures contracts to substantial losses.
 
12




 
There can be
no assurance that a liquid market will exist at a time when a Fund seeks to
close out a futures contract or a futures option position, and the Fund would
remain obligated to meet margin requirements until the position is closed.  In addition, many of the contracts discussed
above are relatively new instruments without a significant trading
history.  As a result, there can be no
assurance that an active secondary market will develop or continue to exist.
 
Over the
Counter Options and Futures Transactions.  Each Fund may invest in options, futures,
swaps and related products.  Each Fund
may enter into interest rate, currency and index swaps and the purchase or sale
of related caps, floors and collars. Each Fund may enter into these
transactions to preserve a return or spread on a particular investment or
portion of its portfolio, to protect against currency fluctuations or to
protect against any increase in the price of securities it anticipates
purchasing at a later date. Swaps may be used in conjunction with other
instruments to offset interest rate, currency or other underlying risks. For
example, interest rate swaps may be offset with “caps,” “floors” or “collars”.  A “cap” is essentially a call option which
places a limit on the amount of floating rate interest that must be paid on a
certain principal amount. A “floor” is essentially a put option which places a
limit on the minimum amount that would be paid on a certain principal amount. A
“collar” is essentially a combination of a long cap and a short floor where the
limits are set at different levels.
 
Each
Fund will usually enter into swaps on a net basis; that is, the two payment
streams will be netted out in a cash settlement on the payment date or dates
specified in the instrument, with a Fund receiving or paying, as the case may
be, only the net amount of the two payments. To the extent obligations created
thereby may be deemed to constitute senior securities, each Fund will maintain
required collateral in a segregated account consisting of U.S. government
securities or cash or cash equivalents.
 
If a Fund were
assigned an exercise notice on a call it has written, it would be required to
liquidate portfolio securities in order to satisfy the exercise, unless it has
other liquid assets that are sufficient to satisfy the exercise of the call.
When a Fund has written a call, there is also a risk that the market may
decline between the time the Fund has a call exercised against it, at a price
which is fixed as of the closing level of the index on the date of exercise,
and the time it is able to sell securities in its portfolio. As with stock
options, a Fund will not learn that an index option has been exercised until
the day following the exercise date but, unlike a call on stock where it would
be able to deliver the underlying securities in settlement, a Fund may have to
sell part of its securities portfolio in order to make settlement in cash, and
the price of such securities might decline before they can be sold. For
example, even if an index call which a Fund has written is “covered” by an
index call held by the Fund with the same strike price, it will bear the risk
that the level of the index may decline between the close of trading on the
date the exercise notice is filed with the Options Clearing Corporation and the
close of trading on the date the Fund exercises the call it holds or the time
it sells the call, which in either case would occur no earlier than the day
following the day the exercise notice was filed.
 
Over-the-Counter
(“OTC”) transactions differ from exchange-traded transactions in several
respects.  OTC transactions are
transacted directly with dealers and not with a clearing corporation. Without
the availability of a clearing corporation, OTC transaction pricing is normally
done by reference to information from market makers, which information is
carefully monitored by the Adviser and verified in appropriate cases.
 
As OTC
transactions are transacted directly with dealers, there is a risk of
nonperformance by the dealer as a result of the insolvency of such dealer or
otherwise. An OTC transaction may only be terminated voluntarily by entering
into a closing transaction with the dealer with whom a Fund originally dealt.
Any such cancellation may require a Fund to pay a premium to that dealer. In
those cases in which a Fund has entered into a covered transaction and cannot
voluntarily terminate the transaction, the Fund will not be able to sell the
underlying security until the transaction expires or is exercised or different
cover is substituted. The Funds intend to enter into OTC transactions only with
dealers which agree to, and which are expected to be capable of, entering into
closing transactions with the Funds. There is also no assurance that a Fund
will be able to liquidate an OTC transaction at any time prior to expiration.
 
The Funds’
administrator shall be entitled to rely upon prices received from a reputable
pricing service. In addition and with respect to securities valued by the
Adviser, the administrator shall be entitled to rely without inquiry upon the
valuations submitted to it by the Adviser and shall have no responsibility to
determine the accuracy or otherwise thereof.
 
Currency
Exchange Transactions. A Fund may engage in
currency transactions with counterparties to hedge the value of portfolio
securities denominated in particular currencies against fluctuations in
relative value, to gain or reduce exposure to certain currencies, or to
generate income or gains.
 
Currency
transactions include currency forward contracts, exchange-listed currency
futures contracts and options thereon, exchange-listed and OTC options on
currencies, and currency swaps.  A
forward currency contract involves a privately negotiated obligation to
purchase or sell (with delivery generally required) a specific currency at a
future date, which may be 
 
13




 
any fixed
number of days from the date of the contract agreed upon by the parties, at a
price set at the time of the contract.  A
currency swap is an agreement to exchange cash flows based on the notional
difference among two or more currencies and operates similarly to an interest
rate swap.
 
Each Fund may
enter into a forward contract to sell, for a fixed amount of U.S. dollars, the
amount of that currency approximating the value of some or all of a Fund’s
portfolio securities denominated in such currency. For example, a Fund may do
this if the manager believes that the currency of a particular country may
decline in relation to the U.S. dollar. Forward contracts may limit potential
gain from a positive change in the relationship between the U.S. dollar and
foreign currencies. Transaction hedging includes entering into a currency transaction
with respect to specific assets or liabilities of the Fund, which will
generally arise in connection with the purchase or sale of portfolio securities
or the receipt of income from them. 
Position hedging is entering into a currency transaction with respect to
portfolio securities positions denominated or generally quoted in that
currency.
 
Each Fund may
cross-hedge currencies by entering into transactions to purchase or sell one or
more currencies that are expected to increase or decline in value relative to
other currencies to which the Fund has or in which the Fund expects to have
exposure.  To reduce the effect of
currency fluctuations on the value of existing or anticipated holdings of its
securities, a fund may also engage in proxy hedging.  Proxy hedging is often used when the currency
to which the Fund’s holdings is exposed is difficult to hedge generally or
difficult to hedge against the dollar. 
Proxy hedging entails entering into a forward contract to sell a
currency, the changes in the value of which are generally considered to be
linked to a currency or currencies in which some or all of the Fund’s
securities are or are expected to be denominated, and to buy dollars.
 
Currency
hedging involves some of the same risks and considerations as other derivative
transactions.  Currency transactions can
result in losses to a Fund if the currency being hedged fluctuates in value to
a degree or in a direction that is not anticipated. Further, the risk exists that
the perceived linkage between various currencies may not be present or may not
be present during the particular time that the Fund is engaging in these
transactions.  Currency transactions are
also subject to risks different from those of other portfolio
transactions.  Because currency control
is of great importance to the issuing governments and influences economic
planning and policy, purchases and sales of currency and related instruments
can be adversely affected by government exchange controls, limitations or
restrictions on repatriation of currency, and manipulations or exchange
restrictions imposed by governments. 
These forms of governmental actions can result in losses to a Fund if it
is unable to deliver or receive currency or monies in settlement of obligations
and could also cause hedges it has entered into to be rendered useless,
resulting in full currency exposure as well as incurring transaction
costs.  Buyers and sellers of currency
futures contracts are subject to the same risks that apply to the use of
futures contracts generally.  Further,
settlement of a currency futures contract for the purchase of most currencies
must occur at a bank based in the issuing nation. Trading options on currency
futures contracts is relatively new, and the ability to establish and close out
positions on these options is subject to the maintenance of a liquid market
that may not always be available. 
Currency exchange rates may fluctuate based on factors extrinsic to that
country’s economy.
 
Investment
in Blank Check Companies.  Each Fund may also invest a maximum of 10% of
total assets in equity securities of so-called “blank check” companies. These
are companies that raise commitments from investors that enable the company to
identify and negotiate an acquisition of an operating company, obtain shareholder
approval of the transaction and then close on the acquisition. There is a risk
that the company will not be able to identify a suitable acquisition candidate
or negotiate a transaction or obtain approval and close on the transaction, in
which case, a Fund may miss other investment opportunities. If the company
closes on an acquisition, it will have similar risks to other operating
companies with similar characteristics operating in a similar industry or
market.
 
Trade
Claims. 
Each Fund may invest a maximum of 10% of total assets in trade claims.
Trade claims are interests in amounts owed to suppliers of goods or services
and are purchased from creditors of companies in financial difficulty and often
involved in bankruptcy proceedings. For purchasers such as the Funds, trade
claims offer the potential for profits since they are often purchased at a
significant discount from face value and, consequently, may generate capital
appreciation in the event that the market value of the claim increases as the
debtor’s financial position improves or the claim is paid.
 
An investment
in trade claims is very speculative and carries a high degree of risk. Trade
claims are illiquid instruments which generally do not pay interest and there
can be no guarantee that the debtor will ever be able to satisfy the obligation
on the trade claim. The markets in trade claims are not regulated by federal
securities laws or the SEC. Because trade claims are unsecured, holders of
trade claims may have a lower priority in terms of payment than certain other
creditors in a bankruptcy proceeding.
 
Repurchase
Agreements. Each Fund may
enter into repurchase agreements.  The
Funds may invest a maximum of 10% of total assets in repurchase
agreements.  A repurchase agreement is a
transaction in which the seller of a security commits itself 
 
14




 
at the time of sale to repurchase that
security from the buyer at a mutually agreed upon time and price.  The resale price is in excess of the purchase
price and reflects an agreed-upon market interest rate unrelated to the coupon
rate on the purchased security. Such transactions afford a Fund the opportunity
to earn a return on temporarily available cash at relatively low market risk.  The manager monitors the value of the
securities underlying the repurchase agreement at the time the transaction is
entered into and at all times during the term of the repurchase agreement to
ensure that the value of the securities always equals or exceeds the repurchase
price.  Each Fund requires that
additional securities be deposited if the value of the securities purchased
decreases below their resale price and does not bear the risk of a decline in
the value of the underlying security unless the seller defaults under the
repurchase obligation.
 
While the underlying security may be a bill,
certificate of indebtedness, note or bond issued by an agency, authority or
instrumentality of the U.S. government, the obligation of the seller is not
guaranteed by the U.S. government and there is a risk that the seller may fail
to repurchase the underlying security. In such event, a Fund would attempt to
exercise rights with respect to the underlying security, including possible
disposition in the market. However, a Fund may be subject to various delays and
risks of loss, including (i) possible declines in the value of the
underlying security during the period while the Fund seeks to enforce its
rights thereto, (ii) possible reduced levels of income and lack of access
to income during this period and (iii) inability to enforce rights and the
expenses involved in the attempted enforcement.
 
Repurchase
agreements with maturities of more than seven days will be treated as illiquid
securities.
 
Reverse
Repurchase Agreements. The Funds may enter into “reverse” repurchase agreements to
avoid selling securities during unfavorable market conditions to meet
redemptions.  The Funds may invest a
maximum of 10% of total assets in reverse repurchase agreements.  Pursuant to a reverse repurchase agreement, a
Fund will sell portfolio securities and agree to repurchase them from the buyer
at a particular date and price.  Whenever
a Fund enters into a reverse repurchase agreement, it will establish a
segregated account in which it will maintain liquid assets in an amount at
least equal to the repurchase price marked to market daily (including accrued
interest), and will subsequently monitor the account to ensure that such
equivalent value is maintained.  A Fund
pays interest on amounts obtained pursuant to reverse repurchase
agreements.  Reverse repurchase
agreements are considered to be borrowings by a Fund. 
 
Borrowing.  Borrowing creates an opportunity for
increased return, but, at the same time, creates special risks.  Furthermore, if a Fund were to engage in
borrowing, an increase in interest rates could reduce the value of the Fund’s
shares by increasing the Fund’s interest expense.
 
Subject to the
limitations described under “Investment Limitations” below, a Fund may be
permitted to borrow for temporary purposes and/or for investment purposes. Such
a practice will result in leveraging of a Fund’s assets and may cause a Fund to
liquidate portfolio positions when it would not be advantageous to do so. This
borrowing may be secured or unsecured. Provisions of the 1940 Act require a
Fund to maintain continuous asset coverage (that is, total assets including
borrowings, less liabilities exclusive of borrowings) of 300% of the amount
borrowed, with an exception for borrowings not in excess of 5% of the Fund’s
total assets made for temporary administrative purposes. Any borrowings for
temporary administrative purposes in excess of 5% of a Fund’s total assets will
count against this asset coverage requirement. If the 300% asset coverage
should decline as a result of market fluctuations or other reasons, a Fund may
be required to sell some of its portfolio holdings within three days to reduce
the debt and restore the 300% asset coverage, even though it may be
disadvantageous from an investment standpoint if the Fund sells securities at
that time.  Borrowing will tend to
exaggerate the effect on net asset value of any increase or decrease in the
market value of a Fund’s portfolio. Money borrowed will be subject to interest
costs which may or may not be recovered by appreciation of the securities
purchased, if any. A Fund also may be required to maintain minimum average
balances in connection with such borrowings or to pay a commitment or other fee
to maintain a line of credit; either of these requirements would increase the
cost of borrowing over the stated interest rate.
 
From time to
time, the Trust may enter into, and make borrowings for temporary purposes
related to the redemption of shares under, a credit agreement with third-party
lenders. Borrowings made under such a credit agreement will be allocated
between the Funds pursuant to guidelines approved by the Board of Trustees.
 
15




 
Warrants. Each Fund may invest in warrants, which are instruments that
give the fund the right to purchase certain securities from an issuer at a
specific price (the “strike price”) for a limited period of time.  The strike price of warrants typically is
much lower than the current market price of the underlying securities, yet they
are subject to similar price fluctuations. 
As a result, warrants may be more volatile investments than the
underlying securities and may offer greater potential for capital appreciation
as well as capital loss.  Warrants do not
entitle a holder to dividends or voting rights with respect to the underlying
securities and do not represent any rights in the assets of the issuing
company.  Also, the value of the warrant
does not necessarily change with the value of the underlying securities and a
warrant ceases to have value if it is not exercised prior to the expiration
date.  These factors can make warrants
more speculative than other types of investments.
 
In
addition to warrants on securities, each Fund may purchase put warrants and
call warrants whose values vary depending on the change in the value of one or
more specified securities indices (“index warrants”).  Index warrants are generally issued by banks
or other financial institutions and give the holder the right, at any time
during the term of the warrant, to receive upon exercise of the warrant a cash
payment from the issuer based on the value of the underlying index at the time
of exercise.  In general, if the value of
the underlying index rises above the exercise price of the index warrant, the
holder of a call warrant will be entitled to receive a cash payment from the
issuer upon exercise based on the difference between the value of the index and
the exercise price of the warrant; if the value of the underlying index falls,
the holder of a put warrant will be entitled to receive a cash payment from the
issuer upon exercise based on the difference between the exercise price of the
warrant and the value of the index.  The
holder of a warrant would not be entitled to any payments from the issuer at
any time when, in the case of a call warrant, the exercise price is greater
than the value of the underlying index, or, in the case of a put warrant, the
exercise price is less than the value of the underlying index.  If a Fund were not to exercise an index warrant
prior to its expiration, then the fund would lose the amount of the purchase
price paid by it for the warrant.
 
Each
Fund will normally use index warrants in a manner similar to its use of options
on securities indices.  The risks of a
Fund’s use of index warrants are generally similar to those relating to its use
of index options. Unlike most index options, however, index warrants are issued
in limited amounts and are not obligations of a regulated clearing agency, but
are backed only by the credit of the bank or other institution which issues the
warrant.  Also, index warrants generally
have longer terms than index options. 
Index warrants are not likely to be as liquid as certain index options
backed by a recognized clearing agency. 
In addition, the terms of index warrants may limit the fund’s ability to
exercise the warrants at such time, or in such quantities, as the fund would
otherwise wish to do.
 
Lending of Securities. The
Funds may lend securities if such loans are secured continuously by liquid
assets consisting of cash, United States Government securities or other
appropriate securities or by a letter of credit in favor of the Fund at least
equal at all times to 100% of the market value of the securities loaned, plus
any accrued interest.  While such
securities are on loan, the borrower pays the applicable Fund any dividends or
income received on the securities loaned and has the right to vote the
securities on any matter in which the securities are entitled to be voted.  Loans may be terminated by the lending Fund
or the borrower and shall be effected according to the standard settlement time
for trades in the particular loaned securities. 
Borrowed securities must be returned to the lending Fund when a loan is
terminated.  If a loan is collateralized
by U.S. Government securities or other non-cash collateral, the lending Fund
receives a fee from the borrower.  If a
loan is collateralized by cash, the lending Fund typically invests the cash
collateral for its own account in short-term, interest-bearing securities and
pays a fee to the borrower that normally represents a portion of the Fund’s
earnings on the collateral.  Any gain or
loss in the market price of the borrowed securities that occurs during the term
of the loan inures to the lending Fund. 
The Funds may incur custodial fees and other costs in connection with
loans.  In addition, the Funds’ lending
agent receives a fixed fee from the Funds, representing a percentage of the
securities loaned.  The Funds may, in the
future, appoint and pay compensation to additional securities lending agents.
 
Each
Fund will loan no more than one-third of its total assets. 
 
In lending
their portfolio securities, the Funds consider all facts and circumstances,
including the creditworthiness of the borrowing financial institution, and the
Funds will not make any loans for terms in excess of one year.  The Funds will recall a loaned security in
order to vote the shares on a material proxy issue.  The Funds will not lend their securities to
any Director, officer, employee, or any other affiliated person (as defined in
the 1940 Act) of the Fund, the Advisor, any sub-advisor, the Administrator or
the Distributor, unless permitted by applicable law.
 
Options
Transactions. 
The Adviser believes that certain transactions in options on securities
and on stock indices may be useful in limiting each Fund’s investment risk and
augmenting its investment return. The Adviser expects, however, the amount of
each Fund’s assets that will be involved in options transactions to be small
relative to the Fund’s assets. Accordingly, it is expected that only a
relatively small portion of each Fund’s investment return will be attributable
to transactions in options on securities and on stock indices. Each Fund may
invest in put and call options transactions involving options on securities and
on stock indices that are traded on U.S. and foreign exchanges or in the
over-the-counter markets.
 
16




 
Securities and
options exchanges have established limitations on the maximum number of options
that an investor or group of investors acting in concert may write.  It is possible that the Funds, other
investment vehicles advised by the Adviser and other clients of the Adviser may
be considered such a group.  Position
limits may restrict a Fund’s ability to purchase or sell options on particular
securities and on stock indices.
 
Index prices
may be distorted if trading in certain stocks included in the index is
interrupted.  Trading in the index options
may also be interrupted in certain circumstances, such as if trading were
halted in a substantial number of stocks included in the index.  If this occurred, a Fund would not be able to
close out options which it had purchased or written and, if restrictions on
exercise were imposed, might be unable to exercise an option it held, which
could result in substantial losses to a Fund.
 
Covered
Option Writing. 
Each Fund may write “covered” calls and “covered” puts on equity or debt
securities and on stock indices in seeking to enhance investment return or to
hedge against declines in the prices of portfolio securities or may write put
options to hedge against increases in the prices of securities which it intends
to purchase. A call option is covered if a Fund holds, on a share-for-share
basis, either the underlying shares or a call on the same security as the call
written where the exercise price of the call held is equal to or less than the
exercise price of the call written (or greater than the exercise price of the
call written if the difference is maintained by a Fund in cash, treasury bills
or other high grade short-term obligations in a segregated account with its
custodian). A put option is “covered” if a Fund maintains cash, treasury bills
or other high grade short-term obligations with a value equal to the exercise
price in a segregated account with its custodian, or holds on a share-for-share
basis a put on the same equity or debt security as the put written where the
exercise price of the put held is equal to or greater than the exercise price
of the put written, or lower than the exercise price of the put written if the
difference is maintained in a segregated account with its custodian.
 
Options on
Stock Indices. 
Each Fund will write call options on broadly based stock market indices
only if at the time of writing it holds a portfolio of stocks. When a Fund
writes a call option on a broadly based stock market index, it will segregate
or put into escrow with its custodian any combination of cash, cash equivalents
or “qualified securities” with a market value at the time the option is written
of not less than 100% of the current index value times the multiplier times the
number of contracts. A “qualified security” is an equity security which is
listed on a securities exchange or on the NASDAQ against which a Fund has not
written a call option and which has not been hedged by the sale of stock index
futures.
 
When-Issued
or Delayed-Delivery Securities. The Funds may
purchase securities on a when-issued or delayed delivery basis.  For example, delivery of and payment for
these securities can take place a month or more after the date of the purchase
commitment.  The purchase price and the
interest rate payable, if any, on the securities are fixed on the purchase
commitment date or at the time the settlement date is fixed.  The value of such securities is subject to
market fluctuations and, in the case of fixed income securities, no interest
accrues to a Fund until settlement takes place. 
When purchasing a security on a when-issued or delayed-delivery basis, a
Fund assumes the rights and risks of ownership of the security, including the
risk of price and yield fluctuations. Accordingly, at the time a Fund makes the
commitment to purchase securities on a when-issued or delayed delivery basis,
it will record the transaction, reflect the value each day of such securities
in determining its net asset value and, if applicable, calculate the maturity
for the purposes of average maturity from that date.  At the time of its acquisition, a when-issued
security may be valued at less than the purchase price.  A Fund will make commitments for such
when-issued transactions only when it has the intention of actually acquiring
the securities.  To facilitate such
acquisitions, each Fund will maintain with the Custodian a segregated account
with liquid assets, consisting of cash, United States Government securities or
other appropriate securities, in an amount at least equal to such
commitments.  On delivery dates for such
transactions, each Fund will meet its obligations from maturities or sales of
the securities held in the segregated account and/or from cash flow.  If, however, a Fund chooses to dispose of the
right to acquire a when-issued security prior to its acquisition, it could, as
with the disposition of any other portfolio obligation, incur a taxable capital
gain or loss due to market fluctuation. 
Also, a Fund may be disadvantaged if the other party to the transaction
defaults.  It is the current policy of
each Fund not to enter into when-issued commitments exceeding in the aggregate
25% of the market value of the Fund’s total assets, less liabilities other than
the obligations created by when-issued commitments.
 
Swap
Agreements.
 
Total Return Swaps.
The Funds may enter into total return swap contracts for investment
purposes.  Total return swaps are
contracts in which one party agrees to make periodic payments based on the
change in market value of the underlying assets, which may include a specified
security, basket of securities or security indexes during the specified period,
in return for periodic payments based on a fixed or variable interest rate of
the total return from other underlying assets. Total return swap agreements may
be used to obtain exposure to a security or market without owning or taking
physical custody of such security or market, including in cases in which there
may be disadvantages associated with direct ownership of a particular security.
In a typical total return equity swap, payments made by a Fund or the
counterparty are based on the total 
 
17




 
return of a
particular reference asset or assets (such as an equity security, a combination
of such securities, or an index). That is, one party agrees to pay another
party the return on a stock, basket of stocks, or stock index in return for a
specified interest rate. By entering into an equity index swap, for example,
the index receiver can gain exposure to stocks making up the index of
securities without actually purchasing those stocks. Total return swaps involve
not only the risk associated with the investment in the underlying securities,
but also the risk of the counterparty not fulfilling its obligations under the
agreement.
 
Credit Default Swaps.
The Funds may enter into credit default swap agreements for investment
purposes.  A credit default swap
agreement may have as reference obligations one or more securities that are not
currently held by the Funds. The Funds may be either the buyer or seller in the
transaction. Credit default swaps may also be structured based on the debt of a
basket of issuers, rather than a single issuer, and may be customized with
respect to the default event that triggers purchase or other factors. As a
seller, a Fund generally receives an up front payment or a fixed rate of income
throughout the term of the swap, which typically is between six months and
three years, provided that there is no credit event. If a credit event occurs,
generally the seller must pay the buyer the full face amount of deliverable
obligations of the reference obligations that may have little or no value. If
the Fund is a buyer and no credit event occurs, the Fund recovers nothing if
the swap is held through its termination date. However, if a credit event
occurs, the buyer may elect to receive the full notional value of the swap in
exchange for an equal face amount of deliverable obligations of the reference
obligation that may have little or no value.
 
The use of swap agreements by a fund entails
certain risks, which may be different from, or possibly greater than, the risks
associated with investing directly in the securities and other investments that
are the referenced asset for the swap agreement. Swaps are highly specialized
instruments that require investment techniques, risk analyses, and tax planning
different from those associated with stocks, bonds, and other traditional
investments. The use of a swap requires an understanding not only of the
referenced asset, reference rate, or index, but also of the swap itself,
without the benefit of observing the performance of the swap under all the
possible market conditions. Because some swap agreements have a leverage
component, adverse changes in the value or level of the underlying asset,
reference rate, or index can result in a loss substantially greater than the
amount invested in the swap itself. Certain swaps have the potential for
unlimited loss, regardless of the size of the initial investment.
 
The largest risks associated with swaps
include: Credit Risk, Liquidity Risk and Market Risk.
 
The Funds may also purchase credit default
swap contracts in order to hedge against the risk of default of the debt of a
particular issuer or basket of issuers, in which case the Funds would function
as the counterparty referenced in the preceding paragraphs. This would involve
the risk that the investment may expire worthless and would only generate
income in the event of an actual default by the issuer(s) of the
underlying obligation(s) (or, as applicable, a credit downgrade or other
indication of financial instability). It would also involve the risk that the
seller may fail to satisfy its payment obligations to the Funds in the event of
a default. The purchase of credit default swaps involves costs, which will
reduce the Funds’ return.
 
Currency Swaps.  The Funds may enter into currency swap
agreements for investment purposes. 
Currency swaps are similar to interest rate swaps, except that they
involve multiple currencies. A Fund may enter into a currency swap when it has
exposure to one currency and desires exposure to a different currency.
Typically the interest rates that determine the currency swap payments are
fixed, although occasionally one or both parties may pay a floating rate of
interest. Unlike an interest rate swap, however, the principal amounts are
exchanged at the beginning of the contract and returned at the end of the
contract. In addition to paying and receiving amounts at the beginning and
termination of the agreements, both sides will also have to pay in full
periodically based upon the currency they have borrowed. Change in foreign
exchange rates and changes in interest rates, as described above, may
negatively affect currency swaps.
 
18




 
INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS
 
Fundamental Investment Restrictions of the
Worldwide Fund and International Fund
 
The investment restrictions set forth below are fundamental policies of
the Funds and may not be
changed without shareholder approval by vote of a majority of the outstanding
voting securities of each Fund. Under these restrictions, each Fund:
 
(1) may not borrow money, except to the extent permitted under the
1940 Act (see “Borrowing” above);
 
(2) may not issue senior securities, except as permitted borrowings
or as otherwise permitted under the 1940 Act1;
 
(3) may not underwrite securities issued by other persons except
to the extent that, in connection with the disposition of its portfolio
investments, it may be deemed to be an underwriter under federal securities
laws;
 
(4) may not concentrate 25% or more of the value of its total
assets in any one industry2 or group of industries;
 
(5) with respect to 75% of its total
assets (exclusive of cash, cash items, and government securities), may not
invest in securities of any issuer if, immediately after such investment, more
than 5% of the total assets of the fund (taken at current value) would be
invested in the securities of such issuer;
 
(6) with respect to 75% of its total
assets, may not acquire more than 10% of the outstanding voting securities of
any issuer;
 
(7) may not purchase or sell real estate, although it may purchase
securities of issuers which deal in real estate, including securities of real
estate investment trusts, and may purchase securities which are secured by
interests in real estate;
 
(8) may
not make loans, except by purchase of debt obligations in which the fund may
invest consistent with its investment policies, by entering into repurchase
agreements, or by lending its portfolio securities. A Fund may loan no more
than one-third of its total assets.
 
(9) may
not purchase or sell commodities, except that the Fund may purchase and sell
futures contracts and options, may enter into foreign exchange contracts, and
may enter into swap agreements and other financial transactions not requiring
the delivery of physical commodities. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Fund
may purchase or sell up to 25% in precious metals directly,3 and
purchase or sell precious metal commodity contracts or options on such
contracts in compliance with applicable commodities laws. 
 
In determining whether a transaction is permitted under the 1940 Act,
Restriction 2 above will be construed not to prohibit any transaction that is
permitted under the 1940 Act, as interpreted or modified, or as otherwise
permitted by regulatory authority having jurisdiction from time to time.
 
In addition, under normal circumstances the Worldwide Fund as well as
the International Fund each will invest in at least three foreign countries.
 

1 Section 18(f)(1)of the 1940 Act
generally prohibits registered open-end investment companies from issuing
senior securities other than with respect to bank borrowings.
Section 18(g) defines “senior security,” in pertinent part, as “any
bond, debenture, note, or similar obligation or instrument constituting a
security and evidencing indebtedness, and any stock of a class having priority
over any other class as to distribution of assets or payment of dividends.”
2 The Funds use the term “industry” as
a classification that refers to a group of companies related in terms of their
primary business activities.
3 
The commodities in which the Fund will invest directly have robust, deep and
liquid markets. The Funds’ investments in precious metals can be readily
liquidated.
 
19




 
Notwithstanding the foregoing investment restrictions, the Funds may
purchase securities pursuant to the exercise of subscription rights.  Japanese and European corporations frequently
issue additional capital stock by means of subscription rights offerings to
existing shareholders at a price substantially below the market price of the
shares.  The failure to exercise such
rights would result in a Fund’s interest in the issuing company being
diluted.  The market for such rights is
not well developed in all cases and, accordingly, a Fund may not always realize
full value on the sale of rights.  The
exception applies in cases where the limits set forth in the investment
restrictions would otherwise be exceeded by exercising rights or would have
already been exceeded as a result of fluctuations in the market value of a Fund’s
portfolio securities with the result that a Fund would be forced either to sell
securities at a time when it might not otherwise have done so, or to forego
exercising the rights.
 
Non-Fundamental Investment Restrictions of the Worldwide Fund and
International Fund
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing investment restrictions, as a
non-fundamental restriction, a Fund may not purchase additional securities
while it has outstanding borrowings exceeding 5% of its total assets.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing investment restrictions, as a
non-fundamental restriction, a Fund may pledge, mortgage, hypothecate, or
otherwise encumber any of its assets to secure borrowings; provided that such
amount shall not exceed one-third of each Fund’s total assets.  This restriction shall not prohibit the Funds
from engaging in options, futures, and non-U.S. currency transactions.
 
20




 
PERFORMANCE
 
Portfolio Turnover.  Purchases and sales of portfolio securities
may be made as considered advisable by the Adviser in the best interests of the
shareholders.  Each Fund’s portfolio
turnover rate may vary from year to year, as well as within a year. A Fund’s
distributions of any net short-term capital gains realized from portfolio
transactions are taxable to shareholders as ordinary income. In addition,
higher portfolio turnover rates can result in corresponding increases in
portfolio transaction costs for a Fund. See “Portfolio Transactions and
Brokerage” in this SAI.
 
For reporting purposes, a Fund’s portfolio
turnover rate is calculated by dividing the lesser of purchases or sales of
portfolio securities for the fiscal year by the monthly average of the value of
the portfolio securities owned by the Fund during the fiscal year. In
determining such portfolio turnover, all securities whose maturities at the
time of acquisition were one year or less are excluded. A 100% portfolio
turnover rate would occur, for example, if all of the securities in the Fund’s
investment portfolio (other than short-term money market securities) were
replaced once during the fiscal year. Portfolio turnover will not be a limiting
factor should the Adviser deem it advisable to purchase or sell securities.
Each Fund’s expected portfolio turnover rate is less than 30% of each Fund’s
total assets in the first year of operations.
 
21




 
MANAGEMENT OF THE FUNDS
 
Trustees and Officers
 
The business
and affairs of each Fund are managed under the direction of its Board of
Trustees (the “Board”).  The Board of
Trustees approves all significant agreements between a Fund and the persons or
companies that furnish services to a Fund, including agreements with its
distributor, investment manager, administrator, custodian and transfer
agent.  The day-to-day operations of the
Funds are delegated to the Funds’ investment manager and administrator.
 
The name,
address, age and principal occupations for the past five years of the Trustees
and officers of the Trust are listed below, along with the number of portfolios
in the Fund complex overseen by and the other directorships held by each
Trustee.  Certain of the Trustees and
officers are also directors and officers of one or more other investment
companies for which the Adviser acts as investment manager.
 
Independent Trustees (1)
 



Name, Age and Address
  


 


Position(s)
  Held with
  the Trust


 


Term of
  Office(2) and
  Length of
  Time Served


 


Principal
  Occupation(s) During
  Past 5 Years


 


Number of
  Portfolios
  in the Fund
  Complex
  Overseen
  by Trustee


 


Other Directorships / 
  Trusteeships Held by
  Trustee


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Adele R. Wailand 
 
born February 1949 
 
645 Madison Avenue 
New York, New York 
10022


 


Trustee and Chair of the Board of Trustees


 


since August 2008


 


Vice President, General Counsel & Corporate Secretary, Case,
  Pomeroy & Company, Inc.


 


2


 


Director of various wholly owned subsidiaries of Case,
  Pomeroy & Company, Inc. 
 
Director, Shaker Museum & Library (not-for-profit)


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Manu Bammi

  born August 1962

  645 Madison Avenue
New York, New York
10022


 


Trustee


 


since August 2008


 


Founder & CEO, Smart Analyst, Inc.


 


2


 


None.


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Ronald S. Gutstein
born
  August 23, 1971
 
645 Madison Avenue
New York, New York
10022


 


Trustee


 


since
  September 2008


 


Institutional
  Trader and Market Maker, Access Securities


 


2


 


None.


 



 

(1) Trustees
who are not “interested persons” of the Trust as defined in the 1940 Act.
(2) Each
Trustee serves until resignation or removal from the Board of Trustees.  
 
Interested Trustee 
 



Name, Age and Address
  


 


Position(s)
  Held with
  the Trust


 


Term of
  Office(1) and
  Length of
  Time Served


 


Principal
  Occupation(s) During
  Past 5 Years


 


Number of
  Portfolios
  in the Fund
  Complex
  Overseen
  by Trustee


 


Other Directorships /
  Trusteeships Held by
  Trustee


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Michael W. Malafronte 
 
born June 1974 
 
645 Madison Avenue
New York, New York 10022


 


President and Trustee


 


since August 2008


 


CEO and Research Analyst, International Value Advisers, LLC
  (2007-present); Senior Research Analyst, Arnhold and S. Bleichroeder
  Advisers, LLC (2005-2007); Portfolio Manager, Oppenheimer & Close
  (prior to 2005)


 


2


 


Director, Bresler & Reiner Inc.


 



 

(1) Each
Trustee serves until resignation or removal from the Board of Trustees.  
 
22




 
Officers
 



Name, Age and Address
  


 


Position(s)
  Held with
  the Trust


 


Term of
  Office and
  Length of
  Time
  Served(1)


 


Principal Occupation(s) During Past 5 Years


 




Shanda Scibilia 
 
born August 1971 
 
645 Madison Avenue
New York, New York
10022


 


Chief Compliance 
Officer and Secretary


 


since August 2008


 


Chief Operating Officer, International Value Advisers, LLC
  (February 2008-present); acting Chief Operating Officer and head of
  compliance, Oppenheimer & Close (prior to February 2008)


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Stefanie J. Hempstead 
 
born July 1973 
 
645 Madison Avenue 
New York, New York 
10022


 


Treasurer


 


since August 2008


 


Chief Financial Officer, International Value Advisers, LLC
  (March 2008-present); Senior Vice President, Arnhold and S. Bleichroeder
  Advisers, LLC (prior to March 2008); Vice President, ASB Securities LLC
  (prior to March 2008); Vice President and Treasurer, First Eagle Funds
  and First Eagle Variable Funds (prior to March 2008)


 



 

(1) The
term of office of each officer is indefinite. Length of time served represents
time served as an officer of the Trust, although various positions may have
been held during the period.
 
The Trust has an Audit Committee and a
Nominating and Governance Committee.  The
members of both the Audit Committee and the Nominating and Governance Committee
consist of all the Independent Trustees of each Fund, namely Manu Bammi, Ronald
S. Gutstein and Adele R. Wailand. Because the Funds have not yet commenced
operations, the committees did not meet during the last fiscal year.  
 
In accordance with its written charter, the
Audit Committee’s primary purposes are to assist the Board in fulfilling its
responsibility for oversight of the integrity of the accounting, auditing and
financial reporting practices of the Funds, the qualifications and independence
of the Funds’ independent registered public accounting firm, and the Funds’
compliance with legal and regulatory requirements.  The Audit Committee reviews the scope of the
Funds’ audits, the Funds’ accounting and financial reporting policies and
practices and its internal controls.  The
Audit Committee approves, and recommends to the Independent Trustees of the
Funds for their ratification, the selection, appointment, retention or
termination of the Funds’ independent registered public accounting firm and
approves the compensation of the independent registered public accounting
firm.  The Audit Committee also approves
all audit and permissible non-audit services provided to the Funds by the
independent registered public accounting firm and all permissible non-audit
services provided by the Funds’ independent registered public accounting firm
to the Adviser and any affiliated service providers if the engagement relates
directly to the Funds’ operations and financial reporting.
 
The Nominating and Governance Committee will
accept nominees recommended by a shareholder as it deems appropriate.  Stockholders who wish to recommend a nominee
should send recommendations to the Fund’s Secretary that include all
information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in
solicitations of proxies for the election of Trustees.  A recommendation must be accompanied by a
written consent of the individual to stand for election if nominated by the
Board of Trustees and to serve if elected by the stockholders.  The Nominating and Governance Committee will
consider nominees recommended by each Fund’s shareholders when a vacancy
becomes available.  
 
Because the Trust is newly organized, the
Trust has not yet paid any compensation to its Trustees.  The following table illustrates amounts
estimated to be paid for the Funds’ initial fiscal year.  The Funds do not pay retirement benefits to
its Trustees and officers.  Officers and
interested Trustees of the Funds are not compensated by the Funds.
 
23




 



Name of Person,
  Position 


 


Aggregate Compensation
  From Trust


 


Pension or Retirement
  Benefits Accrued as Part of
  Fund Expenses


 


Estimated
  Annual
  Benefits Upon
  Retirement


 


Total Compensation
  From Fund Complex Paid
  to Trustee


 




Manu Bammi,
  Trustee*


 


$15,000


 


None


 


None


 


$15,000


 




Ronald S. Gutstein, Trustee* 


 


$15,000


 


None


 


None


 


$15,000


 




Adele R. Wailand, Trustee*


 


$25,000


 


None


 


None


 


$25,000


 



 

* Designates member of Audit Committee.
 
The amounts in the preceding table are based
on estimates for the Fund’s initial fiscal year, which is expected to commence
on or about October 1, 2008 and end on September 30, 2009.  
 
No officer, trustee or employee of the
Adviser or any of its affiliates receives any compensation from the Funds for
serving as an officer or Trustee of the Funds. 
The Trust pays each Trustee who is not an interested person, as defined
by the 1940 Act, of the Adviser or any of its affiliates, a fee of $15,000 per
annum.  The Chair of the Trust receives
an additional annual fee of $10,000. All Trustees are reimbursed for travel and
out-of-pocket expenses incurred to attend such meetings.  
 
As of September 1, Trustees and officers of
each Fund, individually and as a group, owned less than 1% of the outstanding
shares of their respective Funds.  
 
**************
 
As of the date of this SAI, to the knowledge
of the Funds and the Board of Trustees, no single shareholder or group (as the
term is used in Section 13(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934)
beneficially owned of record more than 5% of the outstanding shares of the
Funds with the exception of the following:
 



Fund 


 


Name and Address on
  Account


 


% of Shares


 




IVA Worldwide Fund


 


Charles de Vaulx 
645 Madison Avenue, 12th Floor
  New York. New York 10022


 


100%


%




IVA International Fund


 


Charles de Vaulx 
645 Madison Avenue, 12th Floor
  New York. New York 10022


 


100%


%



 
As of the date of this SAI, Charles de Vaulx owned 100% of the
outstanding shares of beneficial interest of each Fund. Charles de Vaulx may be
deemed to control a Fund until such time as he owns less than 25% of the
outstanding shares of that Fund.
 
24




 
INVESTMENT ADVISORY AND OTHER
SERVICES
 
The Adviser
 
International Value
Advisers, LLC is the investment manager of the Funds (“IVA” or the “Adviser”).
The Adviser was organized as a Delaware limited liability company in 2007. Its
primary place of business is at 645 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10022.
The Adviser’s primary business is to provide a variety of investment management
services to investment vehicles.  The
Adviser is responsible for all business activities and oversight of the
investment decisions made for the Funds. As of September 2, 2008, IVA’s
assets under management total in excess of $555 million. 
 
IVA serves as adviser to each Fund pursuant
to investment advisory agreements dated as of August 21, 2008.  The investment advisory agreement between the
Adviser and each respective Fund provides that the Adviser shall manage the
operations of each Fund, subject to policies established by the Board of
Trustees.  Pursuant to the applicable investment
advisory agreement, the Adviser manages each Fund’s investment portfolio,
directs purchases and sales of portfolio securities and reports thereon to a
Fund’s officers and Trustees regularly. 
The Adviser also provides the office space, facilities, equipment and
personnel necessary to perform the following services for each Fund: SEC
compliance, including record keeping, reporting requirements and registration
statements and proxies; supervision of Fund operations, including custodian,
accountants and counsel and other parties performing services or operational
functions for each Fund; certain administrative and clerical services,
including certain accounting services, facilitation of redemption requests,
exchange privileges, account adjustments, development of new shareholder
services and maintenance of certain books and records; and certain services
related to each Fund’s shareholders, including assuring that investments and
redemptions are completed efficiently, responding to shareholder inquiries and
maintaining a flow of information to shareholders. In addition, the Adviser
pays the compensation of each Fund’s officers, employees and Trustees
affiliated with the Adviser.  Each Fund
bears all other costs of its operations, including the compensation of its
Trustees not affiliated with the Adviser. 
 
As compensation for its services, the
Worldwide Fund pays the Adviser a monthly fee at an annual rate of 0.90% of the
Fund’s average daily net assets and the International Fund pays the Adviser a
monthly fee at an annual rate of 0.90% of the Fund’s average daily net assets.  
 
Under the terms of the investment advisory
agreement between each Fund and the Adviser, neither the Adviser nor its
affiliates shall be liable for losses or damages incurred by a Fund, unless
such losses or damages are attributable to the willful misfeasance, bad faith
or gross negligence on the part of either the Adviser or its affiliates or from
reckless disregard by it of its obligations and duties under the management
contract (“disabling conduct”).  In
addition, the Funds will indemnify the Adviser and its affiliates and hold each
of them harmless against any losses or damages not resulting from disabling
conduct.
 
The Funds, the Adviser, and the Funds’
distributor each have adopted a code of ethics under Rule 17j-1 of the
1940 Act. These codes of ethics permit the personnel of these entities to
invest in securities, including securities that the Funds may purchase or hold.
The codes of ethics are on public file with, and are available from, the SEC.
 
Portfolio
Managers
 
The following tables set forth certain
additional information with respect to the portfolio managers for each of the
Funds. Unless noted otherwise, all information is provided as of September 2,
2008.  
 
Other
Accounts Managed by the Portfolio Managers
 
The table below identifies, for each
portfolio manager, the number of accounts (other than the Funds with respect to
which information is provided) for which he or she has day-to-day management
responsibilities and the total assets in such accounts, within each of the
following categories: registered investment companies, other pooled investment
vehicles, and other accounts.
 



 


 


Registered investment


 


Other pooled investment*


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


companies managed


 


vehicles managed


 


Separate accounts managed


 




 


 


Number of


 


 


 


Number of


 


 


 


Number of


 


 


 




Name of Portfolio Manager


 


Accounts


 


Total assets


 


accounts


 


Total assets


 


accounts


 


Total assets


 




Charles de Lardemelle


 


0


 


$


0


 


2


 


$


380 million


 


2


 


$


175 million


 




Charles de Vaulx


 


0


 


$


0


 


2


 


$


380 million


 


2


 


$


175 million


 



 
25




 



 


 


Registered investment companies


 


Other pooled investment vehicles


 


Separate accounts managed


 




 


 


managed for which Adviser receives a


 


managed for which Adviser


 


for which Adviser receives a


 




 


 


performance-based fee


 


receives a performance-based fee*


 


performance-based fee


 




 


 


Number of


 


 


 


Number of


 


 


 


Number of


 


 


 




Name of Portfolio Manager


 


accounts


 


Total assets


 


accounts


 


Total assets


 


accounts


 


Total assets


 




Charles de Lardemelle


 


0


 


$


0


 


1


 


$


218 million


 


0


 


$


0


 




Charles de Vaulx


 


0


 


$


0


 


1


 


$


218 million


 


0


 


$


0


 



 

*The Adviser manages two private funds. 
One of the two private funds has a feeder (with assets of $218 million)
that charges a performance fee and two feeders that do not charge a performance
fee (with assets of $42 million).  The
other private fund (with assets of $120 million) does not charge a performance
fee. 
 
Portfolio
Manager Compensation
 
Because each portfolio manager manages other
accounts, including accounts that pay higher fees or accounts that pay
performance-based fees, potential conflicts of interest exist, including
potential conflicts between the investment strategy of a Fund and the
investment strategy of the other accounts managed by the portfolio manager and
potential conflicts in the allocation of investment opportunities between a
Fund and the other accounts.
 
Each portfolio manager is a member (partner)
of the Adviser.  As of September 2,
2008, the compensation of each portfolio manager consisted of a partnership
interest in the Adviser’s profits.  The
compensation program does not disproportionately reward outperformance by
higher fee/performance fee products.  An
Adviser membership interest is the primary incentive for persons to maintain
employment with the Adviser.  The Adviser
believes this is the best incentive to maintain stability of portfolio
management personnel. 
 
Potential
Conflicts of Interest
 
Potential conflicts of interest may arise
when a Fund’s portfolio manager has day-to-day management responsibilities with
respect to one or more other funds or other accounts, as is the case for
certain of the portfolio managers listed in the table above.
 
The Adviser and the Funds have adopted
compliance polices and procedures that are designed to avoid, mitigate, monitor
and oversee areas that could present potential conflicts of interest.  The adviser attempts to address these potential
conflicts of interest through various compliance policies that are generally
intended to place all accounts, regardless of fee structure, on the same
footing for investment management purposes. For example, the Adviser seeks to
minimize the effects of competing interests for the time and attention of
portfolio managers by assigning portfolio managers to manage funds and accounts
that share a similar investment style. The Adviser has also adopted trade
allocation procedures that are designed to facilitate the fair allocation of
limited investment opportunities among multiple funds and accounts. The Adviser’s
trade allocation policies generally provide that each day’s transactions in
securities that are purchased or sold by multiple accounts are, insofar as
possible, averaged as to price and allocated between such accounts (including
the Funds) in a manner which in the Adviser’s opinion is equitable to each
account and in accordance with the amount being purchased or sold by each
account. Certain exceptions exist for specialty, regional or sector accounts.
Trade allocations are reviewed on a periodic basis as part of the Adviser’s
trade oversight procedures in an attempt to ensure fairness over time across
accounts and to monitor whether any account is systematically favored over
time.  There is no guarantee, however,
that the policies and procedures adopted by the Adviser and the Funds will be
able to detect and/or prevent every situation in which an actual or potential
conflict may appear.
 
These potential conflicts include:
 
Allocation of Limited Time and Attention.  A portfolio manager who is responsible for
managing multiple funds and/or accounts may devote unequal time and attention
to the management of those funds and/or accounts.  As a result, the portfolio manager may not be
able to formulate as complete a strategy or identify equally attractive
investment opportunities for each of those accounts as might be the case if he
or she were to devote substantially more attention to the management of a
single fund.  The effects of this
potential conflict may be more pronounced where funds and/or accounts overseen
by a particular portfolio manager have different investment strategies.
 
Allocation of Limited Investment
Opportunities. 
If a portfolio manager identifies a limited investment opportunity that
may be suitable for multiple funds and/or accounts, the opportunity may be
allocated among these several funds or accounts, which may limit a fund’s
ability to take full advantage of the investment opportunity.
 
26




 
Pursuit of Differing Strategies.  At times, a portfolio manager may determine
that an investment opportunity may be appropriate for only some of the funds
and/or accounts for which he or she exercises investment responsibility, or may
decide that certain of the funds and/or accounts should take differing
positions with respect to a particular security.  In these cases, the portfolio manager may
place separate transactions for one or more funds or accounts which may affect
the market price of the security or the execution of the transaction, or both,
to the detriment or benefit of one or more other funds and/or accounts.
 
Selection of Brokers/Dealers.  Portfolio managers may be able to select or
influence the selection of the brokers and dealers that are used to execute
securities transactions for the funds and/or accounts that they supervise.  In addition to executing trades, some brokers
and dealers provide portfolio managers with brokerage and research services (as
those terms are defined in Section 28(e) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934), which may result in the payment of higher brokerage fees than
might have otherwise been available. 
These services may be more beneficial to certain funds or accounts than
to others. Although the payment of brokerage commissions is subject to the
requirement that the portfolio manager determine in good faith that the
commissions are reasonable in relation to the value of the brokerage and
research services provided to the fund, a portfolio manager’s decision as to
the selection of brokers and dealers could yield disproportionate costs and
benefits among the funds and/or accounts that he or she manages.
 
Variation in Compensation.  A conflict of interest may arise where the
financial or other benefits available to the portfolio manager differ among the
funds and/or accounts that he or she manages. 
If the structure of the Adviser’s management fee and/or the portfolio
manager’s compensation differs among funds and/or accounts (such as where
certain funds or accounts pay higher management fees or performance-based
management fees), the portfolio manager might be motivated to help certain
funds and/or accounts over others.  The
portfolio manager might be motivated to favor funds and/or accounts in which he
or she has an interest or in which the Adviser and/or its affiliates have
interests.  Similarly, the desire to
maintain or raise assets under management or to enhance the portfolio manager’s
performance record or to derive other rewards, financial or otherwise, could
influence the portfolio manager to lend preferential treatment to those funds
and/or accounts that could most significantly benefit the portfolio manager.
 
Related Business Opportunities.  The Adviser or its affiliates may provide more
services (such as distribution or recordkeeping) for some types of funds or
accounts than for others.  In such cases,
a portfolio manager may benefit, either directly or indirectly, by devoting
disproportionate attention to the management of funds and/or accounts that
provide greater overall returns to the Adviser and its affiliates.
 
Portfolio
Manager Securities Ownership
 
The table below identifies ownership of Fund
securities by each Portfolio Manager.
 



FUND 


 


PORTFOLIO
  MANAGER(S)


 


DOLLAR RANGE OF
  OWNERSHIP OF
  SECURITIES


 




IVA Worldwide Fund


 


Charles de Lardemelle


 


none


 




 


 


Charles de Vaulx


 


$100,001-$500,000


 




IVA International Fund


 


Charles de Lardemelle


 


none


 




 


 


Charles de Vaulx


 


$1-$10,000


 



 
27




 
PROXY VOTING POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES
 
Although
individual Board members may not agree with particular policies or votes by the
Adviser, the Board has approved delegating proxy voting discretion to the
Adviser believing that the Adviser should be responsible for voting because it
is a matter relating to the investment decision making process.
 
Attached as
Appendix A is the summary of the guidelines and procedures that the Adviser
uses to determine how to vote proxies relating to portfolio securities,
including the procedures that the Adviser uses when a vote presents a conflict
between the interests of Fund shareholders, on the one hand, and those of the
Adviser or any affiliated person of the Fund or the Adviser, on the other.  This summary of the guidelines gives a
general indication as to how the Adviser will vote proxies relating to
portfolio securities on each issue listed. 
However, the guidelines do not address all potential voting issues or
the intricacies that may surround individual proxy votes.  For that reason, there may be instances in
which votes may vary from the guidelines presented.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Adviser
always endeavors to vote proxies relating to portfolio securities in accordance
with the Fund’s investment objectives. 
When applicable, information on how the Fund voted proxies relating to
portfolio securities during the most recent prior 12-month period as of June 30
will be available without charge, (1) upon request, by calling (866)
941-4482, and (2) on the SEC’s website at http://www.sec.gov.  
 
SECURITIES RATINGS
 
The rating of
a rating service represents the service’s opinion as to the credit quality of
the security being rated.  However, the
ratings are general and are not absolute standards of quality or guarantees as
to the creditworthiness of an issuer. 
Consequently, the Funds’ investment adviser believes that the quality of
debt securities in which a Fund invests should be continuously reviewed.  A rating is not a recommendation to purchase,
sell or hold a security, because it does not take into account market value or
suitability for a particular investor. 
When a security has received a rating from more than one service, each
rating should be evaluated independently. 
Ratings are based on current information furnished by the issuer or
obtained by the ratings services from other sources which they consider
reliable.  Ratings may be changed,
suspended or withdrawn as a result of changes in or unavailability of such
information, or for other reasons.
 
The following
is a description of the characteristics of ratings used by Moody’s Investors
Service, Inc. (“Moody’s”) and Standard & Poor’s Corporation
(“S&P”).
 
Moody’s Ratings
 
Aaa—Bonds rated Aaa
are judged to be the best quality.  They
carry the smallest degree of investment risk and are generally referred to as
“giltedge.”  Interest payments are
protected by a large or by an exceptionally stable margin and principal is
secure.  Although the various protective
elements are likely to change, such changes as can be visualized are most
unlikely to impair the fundamentally strong position of such bonds.
 
Aa—Bonds rated Aa
are judged to be high quality by all standards. 
Together with the Aaa group they comprise what are generally known as
high grade bonds.  They are rated lower than
the best bonds because margins of protection may not be as large as in Aaa
bonds or fluctuation of protective elements may be of greater amplitude or
there may be other elements present which make the long-term risk appear
somewhat larger than in Aaa bonds.
 
A—Bonds rated A
possess many favorable investment attributes and are to be considered as upper
medium grade obligations.  Factors giving
security to principal and interest are considered adequate but elements may be
present which suggest a susceptibility to impairment sometime in the future.
 
Baa—Bonds rated Baa
are considered as medium grade obligations, i.e., they are neither highly
protected nor poorly secured.  Interest
payments and principal security appear adequate for the present but certain protective
elements may be lacking or may be characteristically unreliable over any great
length of time.  Such bonds lack
outstanding investment characteristics and in fact have speculative
characteristics as well.
 
Ba—Bonds rated Ba
are judged to have speculative elements; their future cannot be considered as
well assured.  Often the protection of
interest and principal payments may be very moderate and thereby not well
safeguarded during both good and bad times over the future.  Uncertainty of position characterizes bonds
in this class.
 
B—Bonds rated B
generally lack characteristics of the desirable investment.  Assurance of interest and principal payments
or of maintenance of other terms of the contract over any long period of time
may be small.
 
Caa—Bonds rated Caa
are of poor standing.  Such bonds may be
in default or there may be present elements of danger with respect to principal
or interest.
 
Ca—Bonds rated Ca
represent obligations which are speculative in a high degree.  Such bonds are often in default or have other
marked shortcomings.
 
S&P Ratings
 
AAA—Bonds rated AAA
have the highest rating.  Capacity to pay
principal and interest is extremely strong.
 
AA—Bonds rated AA
have a very strong capacity to pay principal and interest and differ from AAA
bonds only in small degree.
 
28




 
A—Bonds rated A have
a strong capacity to pay principal and interest, although they are somewhat
more susceptible to the adverse effects of changes in circumstances and economic
conditions than bonds in higher rated categories.
 
BBB—Bonds rated BBB
are regarded as having an adequate capacity to pay principal and interest.  Whereas they normally exhibit protection
parameters, adverse economic conditions or changing circumstances are more
likely to lead to a weakened capacity to pay principal and interest for bonds
in this capacity than for bonds in higher rated categories.
 
BB—B—CCC—CC—Bonds A-1—A-rated BB, B, CCC and
CC are regarded, on balance, as predominantly
speculative with respect to the issuer’s capacity to pay interest and repay
principal in accordance with the terms of the obligation.
 
BB
indicates the lowest degree of speculation among such bonds and CC the highest
degree of speculation.  Although such
bonds will likely have some quality and protective characteristics, these are
outweighed by large uncertainties or major risk exposures to adverse
conditions.
 
29




 
DISTRIBUTOR
 
Shares of the
Funds are offered on a continuous basis through Foreside Distribution Services,
L.P., located at 10 High Street, Suite 302, Boston, MA 02110, (the “Distributor”),
as distributor pursuant to a distribution agreement (the “Distribution
Agreement”) between the Distributor and the Funds.  
 
Rule 12b-1
Plans
 
As described
in the Prospectus, the Funds have adopted Rule 12b-1 plans (“Plans”) for
their Class A and Class C shares. The Plans, among other things,
permit the Class A and Class C share classes to pay the Distributor quarterly
fees, other than in exceptional cases, at annual rates not exceeding 0.25% and
1.00%, respectively, of the assets of the Class A and Class C share
classes as compensation for its services as principal underwriter of the shares
of such classes. Pursuant to Rule 12b-1 under the 1940 Act, each Plan
(together with the Distribution Agreement) was approved by the Funds’ Board of
Trustees, including a majority of the Trustees who are not interested persons
of the Funds (as defined in the 1940 Act) and who have no direct or indirect
financial interest in the operations of the Plan or the Distribution Agreement.
The principal types of activities for which payments under these Plans may be
made include payments to intermediaries for shareholder servicing, for “no
transaction fee” or wrap programs, and for retirement plan record keeping.
Payments under these Plans also may be made for activities such as advertising,
printing and mailing the Prospectuses to persons who are not current
shareholders, compensation to underwriters, compensation to broker-dealers,
compensation to sales personnel, and interest, carrying or other financing
charges.  The Trust believes that the
plans may benefit the Trust by increasing net sales of the Funds (or reducing
net redemptions), potentially allowing the Funds to benefit from economies of
scale.
 
Each Plan may
be terminated by vote of a majority of the Independent Trustees, or by vote of
a majority of the outstanding voting securities of the relevant class of shares
of the relevant Fund. Each Plan may be amended by vote of the relevant
Trustees, including a majority of the relevant independent Trustees, cast in
person at a meeting called for that purpose. Any change in any Plan that would
materially increase the fees payable thereunder by the relevant class of shares
of the relevant Fund requires approval by a vote of the holders of a majority
of such shares outstanding. The Funds’ Trustees review quarterly a written
report of such costs and the purposes for which such costs have been incurred.
 
The Plans will
continue in effect for successive one-year periods, provided that each such
continuance is specifically approved (i) by the vote of a majority of the
Independent Trustees and (ii) by the vote of a majority of the entire
Board of Trustees cast in person at a meeting called for that purpose or by a
vote of a majority of the outstanding securities of the relevant class.
 
30




 
REVENUE SHARING
 
The
Distributor, the Adviser or an affiliate may, from time to time, out of its (or
their) own resources, make substantial cash payments—sometimes referred to as “revenue
sharing” — to broker dealers or financial intermediaries for various reasons in
addition to any Rule 12b-1 payments described elsewhere in this Statement
of Additional Information.  These
payments may support the delivery of services to the Funds or to shareholders
in the Funds, including, without limitation, transaction processing and
sub-accounting services. The recipients of such payments may include the
Distributor, other affiliates of the manager, and broker-dealers, financial
institutions, plan sponsors and administrators and other financial
intermediaries through which investors may purchase shares of a Fund. In some
circumstances, such payments may create an incentive for an intermediary or its
employees or associated persons to recommend or sell shares of a Fund to you,
rather than shares of another mutual fund. Please contact your financial
intermediary or plan administrator or sponsor for details about revenue sharing
payments it may receive.
 
Revenue
sharing payments may include any portion of sub-transfer agency fees that
exceed the costs of similar services provided by the Funds’ transfer agent,
Boston Financial Data Services, Inc. 
Such excess sub-transfer agency payments are paid by the Distributor,
the Adviser or an affiliate out of its or their own resources.  Because payments will vary according to a
number of factors (including, for example, numbers of shareholder accounts
serviced), the firms receiving the largest such excess payments from these
parties can be expected to change in order and composition from time to time.  
 
31




 
COMPUTATION OF NET ASSET VALUE
 
As described
in the Prospectus under the heading “How Fund Share Prices are Calculated”, the
net asset value per share (“NAV”) of a Fund’s shares of a particular class is
determined by dividing the total value of a Fund’s portfolio investments and
other assets attributable to that class, less any liabilities, by the total
number of shares outstanding of that class. The Prospectus further notes that
Fund shares are valued on each day that the New York Stock Exchange is open (a “Business
Day”), and describes the time (the “Valuation Time”) as of which Fund shares
are valued each Business Day. The Trust expects that the holidays upon which
the New York Stock Exchange will be closed are as follows: New Year’s Day,
Martin Luther King, Jr. Day, President’s Day, Good Friday, Memorial Day,
Independence Day, Labor Day, Thanksgiving Day and Christmas Day.
 
Each Fund’s
liabilities are allocated among its classes. The total of such liabilities
allocated to a class plus that class’s distribution and/or servicing fees and
any other expenses specially allocated to that class are then deducted from the
class’s proportionate interest in the Fund’s assets, and the resulting amount
for each class is divided by the number of shares of that class outstanding to
produce the class’s NAV. Under certain circumstances, NAV of classes of shares
of the Funds with higher service and/or distribution fees may be lower than NAV
of the classes of shares with lower or no service and/or distribution fees as a
result of the relative daily expense accruals that result from paying different
service and/or distribution fees. Generally, for Funds that pay income
dividends, those dividends are expected to differ over time by approximately
the amount of the expense accrual differential between a particular Fund’s
classes. In accordance with regulations governing registered investment
companies, a Fund’s transactions in portfolio securities and purchases and
sales of Fund shares (which bear upon the number of Fund shares outstanding)
are generally not reflected in NAV determined for the Business Day on which the
transactions are effected (the trade date), but rather on the following
Business Day.
 
The Board of
Trustees of the Trust has delegated primary responsibility for determining or
causing to be determined the value of the Funds’ portfolio securities and other
assets (including any fair value pricing) and NAV of the Funds’ shares to State
Street Bank and Trust Company, in its capacity as administrator (the “Administrator”),
pursuant to valuation policies and procedures approved by the Board (the “Valuation
Procedures”). The Administrator has, in turn, delegated various of these
responsibilities to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as the Funds’
custodian, and other agents. The Trustees have established a Pricing and Fair Valuation
Committee to which they have delegated responsibility to officers of the
Adviser for overseeing the implementation of the Valuation Procedures and fair
value determinations made on behalf of the Board. As described in the
Prospectus, for purposes of calculating NAV, the Funds’ investments for which
market quotations are readily available are valued at market value. The
following summarizes the methods used by the Funds to determine market values
for the noted types of securities or instruments (although other appropriate
market-based methods may be used at any time or from time to time):
 
Equity
securities are generally valued at the official closing price or the last sale
price on the exchange or over-the-counter market that is the primary market for
such securities. If no sales or closing prices are reported during the day,
equity securities are generally valued at the mean of the last available bid
and asked quotations on the exchange or market on which the security is
primarily traded, or using other market information obtained from a quotation
reporting system, established market makers, or pricing services. If there is
only a bid or only an asked price on such date, valuation will be at such bid
or asked price for long or short positions, respectively.
 
Precious
metals are valued at the spot price at the time trading on the New York Stock
Exchange closes (normally 4:00 p.m. E.S.T.). 
 
Debt
securities (except for short-term investments as described below) for which
market quotations are readily available are valued at the mean between the last
bid and asked prices received from dealers in the over-the-counter market in
the United States or abroad, except that when no asked price is available, debt
securities are valued at the last bid price alone.  Short-term investments having a maturity of
60 days or less are generally valued at amortized cost.
 
Forward
currency contracts are valued at the current cost of offsetting such contracts.  Futures contracts are generally valued at the
settlement price determined by the exchange on which the instrument is
primarily traded or, if there were no trades that day for a particular
instrument, at the mean of the last available bid and asked quotations on the
market in which the instrument is primarily traded.
 
Exchange-traded
options are generally valued at the mean of the bid and asked quotations on the
exchange at closing. Exchange - traded options may also be valued at its NBBO
(national best bid and offer from participant exchanges) reported by the
Options Price Reporting Authority. 
Over-the-counter options not traded on an exchange are valued at the
mean of the 
 
32




 
bid and asked
quotations.  If there is only a bid or
only an asked price on such date, valuation will be at such bid or asked price
for long or short options, respectively.
 
Swap
agreements are generally valued using a broker-dealer bid quotation or on
market-based prices provided by approved pricing sources.
 
Portfolio
securities and other assets initially valued in currencies other than the U.S.
Dollar are converted to U.S. Dollars using exchange rates obtained from pricing
services.  The value of any investment
that is listed or traded on more than one exchange is based on the exchange or
market determined by the Adviser to be the primary trading venue for that
investment.  A quotation from the
exchange or market deemed by the Adviser to be the secondary trading venue for
a particular investment may be relied upon in instances where a quotation is
not available on the primary exchange or market.
 
As described
in the Prospectus, if market quotations are not readily available (including in
cases where available market quotations are deemed to be unreliable), the Funds’
investments will be valued as determined in good faith pursuant to the
Valuation Procedures (so-called “fair value pricing”). Fair value pricing may
require subjective determinations about the value of a security or other asset,
and fair values used to determine a Fund’s NAV may differ from quoted or
published prices, or from prices that are used by others, for the same
investments. Also, the use of fair value pricing may not always result in
adjustments to the prices of securities or other assets held by a Fund. The
Prospectus provides additional information regarding the circumstances in which
fair value pricing may be used and related information. 
 
33




 
DISCLOSURE OF PORTFOLIO HOLDINGS
 
The Board of
Trustees has adopted, on behalf of the Funds, policies and procedures relating
to disclosure of a Fund’s portfolio securities. These policies and procedures
are designed to protect the confidentiality of each Fund’s portfolio holdings
information and to prevent the selective disclosure of such information. These
policies and procedures may be modified at any time with the approval of the
Board of Trustees.
 
Each Fund may
disclose portfolio holdings information as required by applicable law or as
requested by governmental authorities. Portfolio holdings of each Fund will
also be disclosed on a quarterly basis on forms required to be filed with the
SEC as follows: portfolio holdings as of the end of each Fund’s second and
fourth fiscal quarters will be filed as part of the annual or semi-annual
report filed on Form N-CSR, and portfolio holdings as of the end of each
Fund’s first and third fiscal quarters will be filed on Form N- Q.  The Trust’s Form N-CSRs and Form N-Qs
will be available on the SEC’s website at www.sec.gov.
 
Disclosure of
a Fund’s portfolio holdings information that is not publicly available (“Confidential
Portfolio Information”) is periodically made to the Adviser (International
Value Advisers, LLC) and to the Funds’ custodian (State Street Bank and Trust
Company) and sub-custodians, transfer agent 
(Boston Financial Data Services, Inc.), administrator, principal
underwriter (Foreside Distribution Services, L.P.), financial printers (Merrill
Corporation), pricing services, proxy voting services, independent registered
public accounting firm, and counsel (Ropes & Gray LLP) that require
access to such information in order to fulfill their contractual duties with
respect to the Fund (“Financial Service Providers”) and to facilitate the
review of a Fund by certain mutual fund analysts and ratings agencies (such as
Morningstar and Lipper Analytical Services) (“Rating Agencies”); provided that such disclosure is limited to the information
that the Fund believes is reasonably necessary in connection with the services
to be provided. Except to the extent permitted under the Funds’ portfolio
holdings disclosure policies and procedures, Confidential Portfolio Information
may not be disseminated for compensation or other consideration.  Financial Service Providers and Rating
Agencies must sign a non-disclosure agreement unless otherwise approved by the
Chief Compliance Officer of the Funds, are required to keep such information
confidential, and are prohibited from trading based on the information or
otherwise using the information except as necessary in providing services to
the Funds.
 
Before any
disclosure of Confidential Portfolio Information to Financial Service Providers
or Rating Agencies is permitted, the Adviser’s Chief Compliance Officer (or
persons designated by the Adviser’s Chief Compliance Officer) must determine
that, under the circumstances, the disclosure is being made for a legitimate
business purpose. Furthermore, the recipient of Confidential Portfolio Information
by a Financial Service Provider or Rating Agency must be subject to a written
confidentiality agreement that prohibits any trading upon the Confidential
Portfolio Information or the recipient must be subject to professional or
ethical obligations not to disclose or otherwise improperly use the
information, such as would apply to independent registered public accounting
firms or legal counsel.
 
Exceptions to
these procedures may only be made if an officer of the Funds or the Chief
Compliance Officer of the Adviser determine that the disclosure is being made
for a legitimate business purpose, and must be reported to the Board of
Trustees on a quarterly basis.  In
addition, the Funds have policies in place to regulate the Board’s oversight of
the disclosure of portfolio holdings.   
 
The Adviser
shall have primary responsibility for ensuring that a Fund’s portfolio holdings
information is only disclosed in accordance with these policies. As part of
this responsibility, the Adviser will maintain such internal policies and
procedures as it believes are reasonably necessary for preventing the
unauthorized disclosure of Confidential Portfolio Information.
 
Other
registered investment companies that are advised or sub-advised by the Adviser
may be subject to different portfolio holdings disclosure policies, and neither
the Adviser nor the Board of Trustees of the Trust exercises control over such
policies or disclosure. In addition, separate account clients of the Adviser
have access to their portfolio holdings and are not subject to the Funds’
portfolio holdings disclosure policies. Some of the funds that are advised or
sub-advised by the Adviser and some of the separate accounts managed by the
Adviser may have investment objectives and strategies that are substantially
similar or identical to the Funds’, and therefore potentially substantially
similar, and in certain cases nearly identical, portfolio holdings, as the
Funds.
 
34




 
PURCHASE, REDEMPTION AND EXCHANGE
OF SHARES
 
The methods of
buying and selling shares and the sales charges applicable to purchases of
shares of a Fund are described in the Funds’ Prospectus.  As stated in the Prospectus, shares of each
Fund may be purchased at net asset value by various persons associated with the
Trust, the Adviser, certain firms providing services to the Trust or affiliates
thereof for the purpose of promoting good will with employees and others with
whom the Trust has business relationships, as well as in other special circumstances.  Shares are offered to other persons at net
asset value in circumstances where there are economies of selling efforts and
sales related expenses with respect to offers to certain investors.
 
35




 
TAX STATUS
 
Taxation of the Funds: In General
 
The following
discussion of the U.S. federal income tax consequences of investment in a Fund
is based on the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (“the Code”), U.S.
Treasury regulations, and other applicable authority, as of the date of this
SAI.  These authorities are subject to
change by legislative or administrative action, possibly with retroactive
effect.  The following discussion is only
a summary of some of the important U.S. federal tax considerations generally
applicable to investments in a Fund. 
There may be other tax considerations applicable to particular
shareholders.  Shareholders should
consult their own tax advisors regarding their particular situation and the
possible application of foreign, state and local tax laws.
 
Each Fund intends to elect to be treated and to qualify each year as a
regulated investment company under Subchapter M of the Code.  In order to qualify for the special tax
treatment accorded regulated investment companies and their shareholders, each
Fund must, among other things:
 
(a) derive at least 90% of its gross
income for each taxable year from (i) dividends, interest, payments with
respect to certain securities loans, and gains from the sale or other
disposition of stock, securities or foreign currencies, or other income
(including but not limited to gains from options, futures, or forward
contracts) derived with respect to its business of investing in such stock,
securities, or currencies and (ii) net income derived from interests in “qualified
publicly traded partnerships” (as defined below);
 
(b) diversify its holdings so that, at
the end of the quarter of each Fund’s taxable year, (i) at least 50% of
the market value of each Fund’s total assets consists of cash and cash items,
U.S. government securities, securities of other regulated investment companies,
and other securities limited in respect of any one issuer to a value not
greater than 5% of the value of the Fund’s total assets and not more than 10%
of the outstanding voting securities of such issuer, and (ii) not more
than 25% of the value of the Fund’s total assets is invested (x) in the
securities (other than those of the U.S. government or other regulated
investment companies) of any one issuer or of two or more issuers that the Fund
controls and that are engaged in the same, similar, or related trades or
businesses, or (y) in the securities of one or more qualified publicly
traded partnerships (as defined below); and
 
(c) distribute with respect to each
taxable year at least 90% of the sum of its investment company taxable income
(as that term is defined in the Code without regard to the deduction for
dividends paid—generally taxable ordinary income and the excess, if any, of net
short-term capital gains over net long-term capital losses) and net tax-exempt
interest income, for such year.
 
For purposes
of the 90% gross income requirement described in (a) above, income derived
from a partnership will be treated as qualifying income only to the extent such
income is attributable to items of income of the partnership which would be
qualifying income if realized by the regulated investment company.  However, 100% of the net income derived from
an interest in a “qualified publicly traded partnership” will be treated as qualifying
income.  A “qualified publicly traded
partnership” is defined as a partnership (i) interests in which are traded
on an established securities market or readily tradable on a secondary market
or the substantial equivalent thereof, (ii) that derives at least 90% of
its income from the passive income sources defined in Code section 7704(d), and
(iii) that derives less than 90% of its income from the qualifying income
described in (a)(i) above.  In
addition, although in general the passive loss rules of the Code do not
apply to regulated investment companies, such rules do apply to a
regulated investment company with respect to items attributable to an interest
in a qualified publicly traded partnership.
 
Gains from
foreign currencies (including foreign currency options, foreign currency swaps,
foreign currency futures and foreign currency forward contracts) currently
constitute qualifying income for purposes of the 90% good income test,
described in (a) above.  However,
the Treasury Department has the authority to issue regulations (possibly with
retroactive effect) excluding from the definition of “qualifying income” a fund’s
foreign currency gains to the extent that such income is not directly related
to the fund’s principal business of investing in stock or securities.
 
For purposes
of the diversification requirements described in (b) above, in the case of
a Fund’s investment in loan participations, the Fund shall treat both the
financial intermediary and the issuer of the underlying loan as an issuer.  Also, for purposes of (b) above, the
term “outstanding voting securities of such issuer” will include the equity
securities of a qualified publicly traded partnership.
 
36




 
Each Fund may
invest in certain assets that do not give rise to good income and do not
constitute “securities” for purposes of the regulated investment company
qualification tests referred to above. 
Each Fund may also invest in other assets, such as various derivative
and structured investment products, the status of which as “securities” for the
above purposes may not be fully settled.
 
In general, if a Fund qualifies as a regulated investment company that
is accorded special tax treatment, that Fund will not be subject to federal
income tax on income distributed in a timely manner to its shareholders in the
form of dividends (including Capital Gain Dividends, as defined below).
 
By contrast, if a Fund were to fail to qualify as a regulated
investment company in any taxable year, that Fund would be subject to tax on its taxable income at
corporate rates.  In addition, all
distributions from earnings and profits, including any distributions of net
tax-exempt income and net long-term capital gains, would be taxable to
shareholders as dividend income.  Some
portions of such distributions may be eligible for the dividends received
deduction in the case of corporate shareholders or may be treated as qualified
dividend income to individual shareholders. 
Finally, the Fund could be required to recognize unrealized gains, pay
substantial taxes and interest and make substantial distributions before
requalifying as a regulated investment company.
 
Each Fund
intends to distribute at least annually to its shareholders all or
substantially all of its investment company taxable income (computed without
regard to the dividends-paid deduction) and may distribute its net capital
gain.  Investment company taxable income
that is retained by the Fund will be subject to tax at regular corporate
rates.  If a Fund retains any net capital
gain, it will be subject to tax at regular corporate rates on the amount
retained.  However, a Fund may designate
the retained capital gain amount as undistributed capital gains in a notice to
its shareholders who (i) will be required to include in income for federal
income tax purposes, as long-term capital gain, their share of such
undistributed amount, and (ii) will be entitled to credit their
proportionate share of the tax paid by the Fund on such undistributed amount
against their federal income tax liabilities, if any, and to claim refunds on a
properly-filed U.S. tax return to the extent the credit exceeds such
liabilities.  For federal income tax
purposes, the tax basis of shares owned by a shareholder of the Fund will be
increased by an amount equal under current law to the difference between the
amount of undistributed capital gains included in the shareholder’s gross
income and the tax deemed paid by the shareholder under clause (ii) of the
preceding sentence.
 
In determining
its net capital gain for Capital Gain Dividend purposes, a regulated investment
company generally must treat any net capital loss or any net long-term capital
loss incurred after October 31 as if it had been incurred in the
succeeding year.  Treasury regulations
permit a regulated investment company, in determining its taxable income, to
elect to treat all or part of any net capital loss, any net long-term capital
loss or any foreign currency loss incurred after October 31 as if it had
been incurred in the succeeding year.
 
If a Fund fails to distribute in a calendar year an amount at least
equal to the sum of 98% of its ordinary income for such year and 98% of its
capital gain net income for the one-year period ending October 31 of such
year, plus any retained amount from the prior year, that Fund will be subject
to a nondeductible 4% excise tax on the undistributed amounts. 
For these purposes, a Fund will be treated as having distributed any
amount on which it has been subject to corporate income tax in the taxable year
ending within the calendar year. A dividend paid to shareholders in January of
a year generally is deemed to have been paid by a Fund on December 31 of
the preceding year, if the dividend was declared and payable to shareholders of
record on a date in October, November or December of that preceding
year.  Each Fund intends generally to
make distributions sufficient to avoid imposition of the 4% excise tax,
although there can be no assurance that it will be able to do so.
 
Fund Distributions
 
Except in the case of certain shareholders eligible for preferential
tax treatment, e.g., qualified retirement or
pension trusts, shareholders of each Fund generally will be subject to federal
income tax on Fund distributions. 
Distributions are taxable whether shareholders receive them in cash or
reinvest them in additional shares through a dividend reinvestment plan.
 
Distributions are taxable to shareholders even if they are paid from
income or gains earned by a Fund before a shareholder’s investment (and thus
were included in the price the shareholder paid for his or her shares).  Such distributions are likely to occur in
respect of shares purchased at a time when the Fund’s net asset value reflects
gains that are either unrealized, or realized but not distributed.  Such realized gains may be required to be distributed even when a Fund’s net asset value also reflects
unrealized losses.
 
Distributions by a Fund of investment income generally will be taxable
to shareholders as ordinary income. 
Taxes on distributions of capital gains are determined by how long the
Fund owned the investments that generated them, rather than how long a
shareholder has owned his or her shares. 
Distributions of net capital gains from the sale of investments that the

 
37




 
Fund owned for more than one year and that are properly designated by
the Fund as capital gain dividends (“Capital Gain Dividends”) will be taxable
as long-term capital gains. 
Distributions from capital gains are generally made after applying any
available capital loss carryovers. 
Long-term capital gain rates applicable to individuals have been
temporarily reduced—in general, to 15% with lower rates applying to taxpayers in
the 10% and 15% rate brackets—for taxable years beginning before January 1,
2011.  Distributions of gains from the
sale of investments that the Fund owned for one year or less will be taxable as
ordinary income.
 
For taxable years
beginning before January 1, 2011, distributions of investment income
designated by a Fund as derived from “qualified dividend income” will be taxed
in the hands of individuals at the rates applicable to long-term capital gain,
provided that both the shareholder and the Fund meet certain holding period and
other requirements.  Specifically, in order for some
portion of the dividends received by a Fund shareholder to be “qualified
dividend income,” the Fund must meet certain holding period and other
requirements with respect to some portion of the dividend-paying stocks in its
portfolio and the shareholder must meet certain holding period and other
requirements with respect to the Fund’s shares. 
A dividend will not be treated as qualified dividend income (at either
the Fund or shareholder level) (1) if the dividend is received with
respect to any share of stock held for fewer than 61 days during the 121-day
period beginning on the date which is 60 days before the date on which such
share becomes ex-dividend with respect to such dividend (or, in the case of
certain preferred stock, 91 days during the 181-day period beginning 90 days
before such date), (2) to the extent that the recipient is under an
obligation (whether pursuant to a short sale or otherwise) to make related
payments with respect to positions in substantially similar or related
property, (3) if the recipient elects to have the dividend income treated
as investment income for purposes of the limitation on deductibility of
investment interest, or (4) if the dividend is received from a foreign
corporation that is (a) not eligible for the benefits of a comprehensive
income tax treaty with the United States (with the exception of dividends paid
on stock of such a foreign corporation that is readily tradable on an
established securities market in the United States) or (b) treated as a
passive foreign investment company.
 
In general, distributions of investment income designated by the Fund
as derived from qualified dividend income will be treated as qualified dividend
income by a shareholder taxed as an individual, provided the shareholder meets
the holding period and other requirements described above with respect to the
Fund’s shares.  If the aggregate
qualified dividends received by the Fund during any taxable year are 95% or
more of its gross income (excluding net long-term capital gain over net
short-term capital loss), then 100% of the Fund’s dividends (other than
dividends properly designated as Capital Gain Dividends) will be eligible to be
treated as qualified dividend income.
 
Dividends of net investment income received by corporate shareholders
of each Fund will qualify for the 70% dividends received deduction generally
available to corporations to the extent of the amount of qualifying dividends
received by the Fund from domestic corporations for the taxable year.  A dividend received by a Fund will not be treated as a qualifying dividend (1) if
the stock on which the dividend is paid is considered to be “debt-financed”
(generally, acquired with borrowed funds), (2) if it has been received
with respect to any share of stock that the Fund has held for less than 46 days
during the 91-day period beginning on the date which is 45 days before the date
on which such share becomes ex-dividend with respect to such dividend (less
than 91 days during the 181-day period beginning 90 days before such date in
the case of certain preferred stock) or (3) to the extent that the Fund is
under an obligation (pursuant to a short sale or otherwise) to make related
payments with respect to positions in substantially similar or related
property.  Moreover, the dividends
received deduction may be disallowed or reduced (1) if the corporate
shareholder fails to satisfy the foregoing requirements with respect to its
shares of the Fund or (2) otherwise by application of the Code.
 
A portion of
the interest paid or accrued on certain high yield discount obligations owned
by a Fund may be treated as a dividend for purposes of the corporate dividends
received deduction.  In such cases, if
the issuer of the high yield discount obligations is a domestic corporation,
dividend payments by the Fund may be eligible for the dividends received
deduction to the extent of the deemed dividend portion of such accrued
interest.
 
If a Fund makes a distribution to a shareholder in excess of the Fund’s
current and accumulated earnings and profits in any taxable year, the excess
distribution will be treated as a return of capital to the extent of such
shareholder’s tax basis in its shares, and thereafter as capital gain.  A return of capital is not taxable, but it
reduces a shareholder’s tax basis in its shares, thus reducing any loss or
increasing any gain on a subsequent taxable disposition by the shareholder of
its shares.
 
Sales, Redemptions, and Exchanges
 
The sale, exchange or redemption of Fund shares may give rise to a gain
or loss.  In general, any gain or loss
realized upon a taxable disposition of shares will be treated as long-term
capital gain or loss if the shares have been held for more than 12 months.  Otherwise, the gain or loss on a taxable disposition of Fund shares will be treated as short-term
capital gain or loss.  However, any loss
realized upon a taxable disposition of shares held for six months or less will
be treated as long-term, rather 
 
38




 
than short-term, to the extent of any long-term capital gain
distributions received (or deemed received) by the shareholder with respect to
the shares.  All or a portion of any loss
realized upon a taxable disposition of Fund shares will be disallowed if other
substantially identical shares of the Fund are purchased within 30 days before
or after the disposition.  In such a
case, the basis of the newly purchased shares will be adjusted to reflect the
disallowed loss.
 
Foreign
Taxes and Investments.
 
Income
received by a Fund from sources within foreign countries may be subject to
withholding and other taxes imposed by such countries.  Tax treaties between certain countries and
the U.S. may reduce or eliminate such taxes. 
If more than 50% of a Fund’s assets at year end consist of the
securities of foreign corporations, the Fund may elect to permit shareholders
to claim a credit or deduction on their income tax returns for their pro rata
portions of qualified taxes paid by the Fund to foreign countries in respect of
foreign securities that the Fund has held for at least the minimum period
specified in the Code.  In such a case,
shareholders will include in gross income from foreign sources their pro rata
share of such taxes.  A shareholder’s
ability to claim a foreign tax credit or deduction in respect of foreign taxes
paid by a Fund may be subject to certain limitations imposed by the Code, which
may result in the shareholder’s not getting a full credit or deduction for the
amount of such taxes. Shareholders who do not itemize on their federal income
tax returns may claim a credit (but not a deduction) for such foreign taxes.
 
A Fund may
invest in one or more “passive foreign investment companies” (“PFICs”).  A PFIC is generally any foreign corporation
if, for any year in the Fund’s holding period, (i) 75 percent or more of
the income of the corporation is passive income, or (ii) at least 50
percent of the assets of the corporation (generally by value, but by adjusted
tax basis in certain cases) produce or are held for the production of passive
income.  Generally, passive income for
this purpose means dividends, interest (including income equivalent to
interest), royalties, rents, annuities, the excess of gain over losses from
certain property transactions and commodities transactions, and foreign
currency gains.
 
Investments by
a Fund in a PFIC could potentially subject the Fund to a U.S. federal income
tax (including interest charges) on distributions received from the PFIC or on
proceeds received from the disposition of shares in the PFIC.  This tax cannot be eliminated by making
distributions to Fund shareholders. 
However, a Fund may make elections to avoid the imposition of such taxes.  For example, a Fund may be able to elect to
treat a PFIC as a “qualified electing fund” (i.e., make a “QEF election”), in
which case the Fund will be required to include its share of the PFIC’s income
and net capital gains annually, regardless of whether it receives any
distribution from the PFIC.  A Fund may
also make an election to mark the gains (and to a limited extent losses) in a
PFIC “to the market” as though it had sold and repurchased its holdings in the
PFIC on the last day of the Fund’s taxable year.  Such gains and losses are treated as ordinary
income and loss.  The QEF and
mark-to-market elections may accelerate the recognition of income by the Fund
(without the receipt of cash) and increase the amount required to be
distributed by the Fund to avoid taxation. 
Making either of these elections therefore may require the Fund to
liquidate other investments (including when it is not advantageous to do so) to
meet its distribution requirement, which also may accelerate the recognition of
gain and affect the Fund’s total return. 
Dividends paid by PFICs will not be eligible to be treated as “qualified
dividend income.”
 
Finally, a
Fund’s transactions in foreign currencies, foreign currency-denominated debt
obligations and certain foreign currency options, futures contracts and forward
contracts (and similar instruments) may give rise to ordinary income or loss to
the extent such income or loss results from fluctuations in the value of the
foreign currency concerned.
 
Certain
Investments in Debt Obligations
 
If a Fund
purchases a debt obligation with acquisition discount or original issue
discount (“OID”), the Fund may be required to include the acquisition discount
or OID in income over the term of the debt security, even though payment of
that amount is not received until a later time, usually when the debt security
matures.  A Fund may make one or more of
the elections applicable to debt obligations having acquisition discount or
OID, which could affect the character and timing of recognition of income by
the Fund.  The Fund may be required to
pay out as an income distribution each year an amount which is greater than the
total amount of cash interest the Fund actually received.  Such distributions may be made from the cash
assets of the Fund or by liquidation of portfolio securities, if
necessary.  The Fund may realize gains or
losses from such liquidations.  In the
event the Fund realizes net capital gains from such transactions, its
shareholders may receive a larger distributions than they would in the absence
of such transactions.
 
Payment-in-kind
securities will also give rise to income which is required to be distributed
even though the Fund holding the security receives no interest payment in cash
on the security during the year.  In
addition, investments in certain ETNs may accrue interest which is required to
be distributed to shareholders, even though the Fund may not receive any
interest payment in cash on the security during the year.
 
39




 
Investments in
debt obligations that are in the lowest rating categories or are unrated,
including debt obligations of issuers at risk of or in default present special
tax issues for the Fund.  Tax rules are
not entirely clear about issues such as when the Fund may cease to accrue
interest, OID or market discount, when and to what extent deductions may be
taken for bad debts or worthless securities and how payments received on
obligations in default should be allocated between principal and interest.  These and other related issues will be addressed
by each Fund when, as and if it invests in such securities, in order to seek to
ensure that it distributes sufficient income to preserve its status as a
regulated investment company and does not become subject to U.S. federal income
or excise tax.
 
Derivative
Transactions
 
If a Fund
engages in derivative transactions, including transactions in options, futures
contracts, forward contracts, swap agreements, foreign currencies and
straddles, other Section 1256 contracts or other similar transactions,
including for hedging purposes, it will be subject to special tax rules (including
mark-to-market, constructive sale, straddle, wash sale and short sale rules),
the effect of which may be to accelerate income to the Fund, defer losses to
the Fund, cause adjustments in the holding periods of the Fund’s securities,
convert long-term capital gains into short-term capital gains and convert
short-term capital losses into long-term capital losses.  These rules could therefore affect the
amount, timing and character of distributions to shareholders.
 
A Fund’s
transactions in foreign currency-denominated debt instruments and certain of
its derivative activities may produce a difference between its book income and
its taxable income.  If the Fund’s book
income exceeds its taxable income, the distribution (if any) of such excess
generally will be treated as (i) a dividend to the extent of the Fund’s
remaining earnings and profits (including earnings and profits arising from
tax-exempt income), (ii) thereafter, as a return of capital to the extent
of the recipient’s basis in its shares, and (iii) thereafter, as gain from
the sale or exchange of a capital asset. 
If the Fund’s book income is less than the sum of its taxable income and
net tax-exempt income (if any), the Fund could be required to make
distributions exceeding book income to qualify as a regulated investment
company and to eliminate fund-level income tax.
 
Certain
Investments in Real Estate Investment Trusts.
 
If a Fund
invests in equity securities of real estate investment trusts (“REITs”), such
investments may require the Fund to accrue and distribute income not yet
received.  In order to generate
sufficient cash to make the requisite distributions, a Fund may be required to
sell securities in its portfolio (including when it is not advantageous to do
so) that it otherwise would have continued to hold.  A Fund’s investment in REIT equity securities
may at other times result in the fund’s receipt of cash in excess of the REIT’s
earnings.  If a Fund distributes such
amounts, such distribution could constitute a return of capital to the Fund’s
shareholders for federal income tax purposes. 
Dividends received by a Fund from a REIT generally will not constitute
qualified dividend income.
 
A Fund may invest directly or indirectly in residual interests in real
estate mortgage investment conduits (“REMICs”) or equity interests in taxable
mortgage pools (“TMPs”) or REITs that invest in TMPs. Under a notice issued by
the IRS and Treasury regulations that have not yet been issued, but may apply
retroactively, a portion of a Fund’s income (including income allocated to the
Fund from a REIT or other pass-through entity) that is attributable to a
residual interest in a REMIC or an equity interest in a TMP (referred to in the
Code as an “excess inclusion”) will be subject to federal income tax in all
events. This notice also provides, and the regulations are expected to provide,
that excess inclusion income of a regulated investment company, such as the
Funds, will be allocated to shareholders of the regulated investment company in
proportion to the dividends received by such shareholders, with the same
consequences as if the shareholders held the related interest directly.  As a result, a Fund investing in such
interests may not be a suitable investment for certain tax-exempt shareholders,
as discussed under Tax-Exempt Shareholders
below.
 
In general, excess inclusion income allocated to shareholders (i) cannot
be offset by net operating losses (subject to a limited exception for certain
thrift institutions), (ii) will constitute unrelated business taxable
income (“UBTI”) to entities (including a qualified pension plan, an individual
retirement account, a 401(k) plan, a Keogh plan or other tax-exempt
entity) subject to tax on unrelated business income, thereby potentially
requiring such an entity that is allocated excess inclusion income, and
otherwise might not be required to file a tax return, to file a tax return and
pay tax on such income, and (iii) in the case of a non-U.S. shareholder,
will not qualify for any reduction in U.S. federal withholding tax.
 
40




 
Tax-Exempt Shareholders
 
Under current law, the Funds generally serve to “block” (that is,
prevent the attribution to shareholders of) UBTI from being realized by tax-exempt
shareholders.  Notwithstanding this “blocking”
effect, a tax-exempt shareholder of a Fund could realize UBTI by virtue of its
investment in a Fund if shares in that Fund constitute debt-financed property
in the hands of the tax-exempt shareholder within the meaning of Code Section 514(b).  A tax-exempt shareholder may also recognize
UBTI if a Fund recognizes “excess inclusion income” derived from direct or
indirect investments in residual interests in REMICS or equity interests in
TMPs (as described above).  Any
investment by a Fund in residual interests of a Collateralized Mortgage
Obligation (a “CMO”) that has elected to be treated as a REMIC can create
complex tax problems, especially if the Fund has state or local governments or
other tax-exempt organizations as shareholders.
 
In addition,
special tax consequences apply to charitable remainder trusts (“CRTs”) that
invest in regulated investment companies that invest directly or indirectly in
residual interests in REMICs or equity interests in TMPs. Under legislation
enacted in December 2006, a CRT, as defined in section 664 of the Code,
that realizes UBTI for a taxable year must pay an excise tax annually of an
amount equal to such UBTI. Under IRS guidance issued in November 2006, a
CRT will not recognize UBTI solely as a result of investing in a Fund that
recognizes “excess inclusion income” (which is described earlier). Rather, as
described above, if at any time during any taxable year a CRT (or one of
certain other tax-exempt shareholders, such as the United States, a state or
political subdivision, or an agency or instrumentality thereof, and certain
energy cooperatives) is a record holder of a share in a Fund that recognizes “excess
inclusion income,” then such Fund will be subject to a tax on that portion of
its “excess inclusion income” for the taxable year that is allocable to such
shareholders at the highest federal corporate income tax rate. The extent to
which the IRS guidance in respect of CRTs remains applicable in light of the December 2006
CRT legislation is unclear. To the extent permitted under the 1940 Act, the
Funds may elect to allocate any such tax specially to the applicable CRT, or
other shareholder, and thus reduce such shareholder’s distributions for the
year by the amount of the tax that relates to such shareholder’s interest in
the Fund. CRTs are urged to consult their tax advisors concerning the
consequences of investing in a Fund.
 
Backup
Withholding
 
Each Fund generally is required to withhold and remit to the U.S.
Treasury a percentage of the taxable distributions and redemption proceeds paid
to any individual shareholder who fails to properly furnish the Fund with a
correct taxpayer identification number (“TIN”), who has under-reported dividend
or interest income, or who fails to certify to the Fund that he or she is not
subject to such withholding.  The backup
withholding tax rate is 28% for amounts paid through 2010.  This rate will expire, and the backup
withholding tax rate will be 31% for amounts paid after December 31, 2010,
unless Congress enacts legislation providing otherwise.
 
Non-U.S.
Shareholders.
 
In general,
dividends (other than capital gain dividends) paid by a Fund to a shareholder
that is not a “U.S. person” within the meaning of the Code (such
shareholder, a “foreign person”) are subject to withholding of U.S. federal
income tax at a rate of 30 percent (or lower applicable treaty rate) even if
they are funded by income or gains (such as portfolio interest, short-term
capital gains, or foreign-source dividend and interest income) that, if paid to
a foreign person directly, would not be subject to withholding.
 
Previous
legislation provided that, in general, for taxable years of a Fund beginning
before January 1, 2008, a Fund was not required to withhold any amounts
with respect to (i) distributions of net short-term capital gains in
excess of net long-term capital losses, and (ii) distributions of
U.S.-source interest income that would not be subject to U.S. federal income
tax if earned directly by a foreign person, in each case to the extent that the
Fund properly designated such distributions. 
Under this prior legislation, a Fund was also allowed to opt not to
designate dividends as interest-related dividends or short-term capital gain
dividends to the full extent permitted by the Code.  The exemption from withholding for interest
related and short-term capital gain dividends is no longer effective.  Pending legislation may reinstate and extend
this exemption, but it is unclear at this time whether the legislation will be
enacted.
 
In order to
qualify for this exemption from withholding, if it is reinstated, a foreign
person will need to comply with applicable certification requirements relating
to its non-US status (including, in general, furnishing an IRS Form W-8BEN
or substitute Form).  In the case of
shares held through an intermediary, the intermediary may withhold even if the
Fund makes a designation with respect to a payment.  Foreign persons should contact their
intermediaries regarding the application of these rules to their accounts.
 
Under U.S.
federal tax law, a beneficial holder of shares who is a foreign person is not,
in general, subject to U.S. federal income tax on gains (and is not allowed a
deduction for losses) realized on the sale of shares of a Fund or on Capital
Gain Dividends unless (i) such gain or Capital Gain Dividend is
effectively connected with the conduct of a trade or business 
 
41




 
carried on by such holder
within the United States or (ii) in the case of an individual holder, the
holder is present in the United States for a period or periods aggregating 183
days or more during the year of the sale or Capital Gain Dividend and certain
other conditions are met.  If a
shareholder is eligible for the benefits of a tax treaty, any effectively
connected income or gain will generally be subject to U.S. federal income tax
on a net basis only if it is also attributable to a permanent establishment
maintained by the shareholder in the United States.
 
In order for a
foreign investor to qualify for an exemption from the backup withholding, the
foreign investor must comply with special certification and filing
requirements.  Foreign investors in the
Fund should consult their tax advisers in this regard.  Backup withholding is not an additional
tax.  Any amounts withheld may be
credited against the shareholder’s U.S. federal income tax liability, provided
the appropriate information is furnished to the Internal Revenue Service.
 
A beneficial
holder of shares who is a foreign person may be subject to state and local tax
and to the U.S. federal estate tax in addition to the federal tax on income
referred to above.
 
Tax Deferred Plans
 
Special tax rules apply
to investments through defined contribution plans and other tax-qualified
plans.  Shareholders should consult their
tax advisers to determine the suitability of shares of a Fund as an investment
through such plans and the precise effect of such an investment on their
particular tax situation.
 
Tax Shelter Reporting
 
Under Treasury
regulations, if a shareholder recognizes a loss of $2 million or more for an
individual shareholder or $10 million or more for a corporate shareholder, the
shareholder must file with the Internal Revenue Service a disclosure statement
on Form 8886.  Direct shareholders
of portfolio securities are in many cases excepted from this reporting
requirement, but under current guidance, shareholders of a regulated investment
company are not excepted.  Future
guidance may extend the current exception from this reporting requirement to
shareholders of most or all regulated investment companies.  The fact
that a loss is reportable under these regulations does not affect the legal
determination of whether the taxpayer’s treatment of the loss is proper.  Shareholders should consult their tax
advisers to determine the applicability of these regulations in light of their
individual circumstances.
 
42




 
PORTFOLIO TRANSACTIONS AND
BROKERAGE
 
Investment
Decisions and Portfolio Transactions
 
Investment
decisions for the Funds are made with a view to achieving their respective
investment objectives. Investment decisions are the product of many factors in
addition to basic suitability for the particular client involved (including the
Funds). Some securities considered for investment by the Funds may also be
appropriate for other clients served by the Adviser. Thus, a particular
security may be bought or sold for certain clients even though it could have
been bought or sold for other clients at the same time. If a purchase or sale
of securities consistent with the investment policies of a Fund and one or more
of these clients is considered at or about the same time, transactions in such
securities will be allocated among the Fund and clients in a manner deemed fair
and reasonable by the Adviser. Particularly when investing in less liquid or
illiquid securities of smaller capitalization companies, such allocation may
take into account the asset size of a Fund in determining whether the
allocation of an investment is suitable. The Adviser may aggregate orders for
the Funds with simultaneous transactions entered into on behalf of its other
clients so long as price and transaction expenses are averaged either for the
portfolio transaction or for that day. Likewise, a particular security may be
bought for one or more clients when one or more clients are selling the
security. In some instances, one client may sell a particular security to
another client. It also sometimes happens that two or more clients
simultaneously purchase or sell the same security, in which event each day’s
transactions in such security are, insofar as possible, averaged as to price
and allocated between such clients in a manner which in the Adviser’s opinion
is equitable to each and in accordance with the amount being purchased or sold
by each. There may be circumstances when purchases or sales of portfolio
securities for one or more clients will have an adverse effect on other
clients, including the Funds.
 
Brokerage
and Research Services
 
There is
generally no stated commission in the case of securities traded on a principal
basis in the over-the-counter markets, but the price paid by the Funds usually
includes an undisclosed dealer commission or markup. In underwritten offerings,
the price paid by the Funds includes a disclosed, fixed commission or discount
retained by the underwriter or dealer. Transactions on U.S. stock exchanges and
other agency transactions involve the payment by the Funds of negotiated
brokerage commissions. Such commissions vary among different brokers. Also, a
particular broker may charge different commissions according to such factors as
the difficulty and size of the transaction. Transactions in non-U.S. securities
generally involve the payment of fixed brokerage commissions, which are
generally higher than those in the United States.  The purchase by a Fund of participations or
assignments may be pursuant to privately negotiated transactions pursuant to
which a Fund may by required to pay fees to the seller or forego a portion of
payments in respect of the participation agreement.
 
The Adviser
places orders for the purchase and sale of portfolio securities, options and
futures contracts and buys and sells such securities, options and futures for a
Fund through a substantial number of brokers and dealers. In so doing, the
Adviser uses its best efforts to obtain for the Fund the most favorable price
and execution available, except to the extent it may be permitted to pay higher
brokerage commissions as described below. In seeking the most favorable price
and execution, the Adviser, having in mind a Fund’s best interests, considers
all factors it deems relevant, including, by way of illustration, price, the
size of the transaction, the nature of the market for the security, the amount
of the commission, the timing of the transaction taking into account market
prices and trends, the reputation, experience and financial stability of the
broker-dealer involved and the quality of service rendered by the broker-dealer
in that or other transactions.
 
The Adviser
places orders for the purchase and sale of portfolio investments for a Fund’s
accounts with brokers or dealers selected by it in its discretion. In effecting
purchases and sales of portfolio securities for the accounts of the Funds, the
Adviser will seek the best price and execution of the Funds’ orders. In doing
so, a Fund may pay higher commission rates than the lowest available when the
Adviser believes it is reasonable to do so in light of the value of the
brokerage and research services provided by the broker effecting the
transaction, as discussed below. Although the Funds may use a broker-dealer
that sells Fund shares to effect transactions for the Funds’ portfolios, the
Funds will not consider the sale of Fund shares as a factor when selecting
broker-dealers to execute those transactions.
 
Each Fund
currently has no intention to use soft dollars.
 
It has for
many years been a common practice in the investment advisory business for
advisers of investment companies and other institutional investors to receive
research and brokerage products and services (together, “services”) from
broker-dealers which execute portfolio transactions for the clients of such
advisers. Consistent with this practice, the Adviser receives services from
many broker-dealers with which the Adviser places the Funds’ portfolio
transactions. These services,
 
43




 
which in some
cases may also be purchased for cash, may include, among other things, such
items as general economic and security market reviews, industry and company
reviews, evaluations of securities, recommendations as to the purchase and sale
of securities, and services related to the execution of securities
transactions. The advisory fees paid by the Funds are not reduced because the
Adviser receives such services even though the receipt of such services
relieves the Adviser from expenses they might otherwise bear. Research and
brokerage services provided by broker-dealers chosen by the Adviser to place
the Funds’ portfolio transactions may be useful to the Adviser in providing
services to the Adviser’s other clients, although not all of these services may
be necessarily useful and of value to the Adviser in managing the Funds.
Conversely, research and brokerage services provided to the Adviser by
broker-dealers in connection with trades executed on behalf of other clients of
the Adviser may be useful to the Adviser in managing the Funds, although not
all of these services may be necessarily useful and of value to the Adviser in
managing such other clients.
 
In reliance on
the “safe harbor” provided by Section 28(e) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “1934 Act”), the Adviser may cause a Fund
to pay a broker-dealer which provides “brokerage and research services” (as
defined for purposes of Section 28(e)) to the Adviser an amount of
commission for effecting a securities transaction for the Fund in excess of the
commission which another broker-dealer would have charged for effecting that
transaction if the Adviser determines in good faith that the commission is
reasonable in relation to the value of the brokerage and research services
provided by the broker-dealer viewed in terms of either a particular
transaction or the Adviser’s overall responsibilities to the advisory accounts
for which it exercises investment discretion.
 
The Adviser
may place orders for the purchase and sale of exchange-listed portfolio
securities with a broker-dealer that is an affiliate of the Adviser where, in
the judgment of the Adviser, such firm will be able to obtain a price and
execution at least as favorable as other qualified broker-dealers. Pursuant to rules of
the SEC, a broker-dealer that is an affiliate of the Adviser may receive and
retain compensation for effecting portfolio transactions for a Fund on a
securities exchange if the commissions paid to such an affiliated broker-dealer
by a Fund on exchange transactions do not exceed “usual and customary brokerage
commissions.” The rules define “usual and customary” commissions to
include amounts which are “reasonable and fair compared to the commission, fee
or other remuneration received or to be received by other brokers in connection
with comparable transactions involving similar securities being purchased or
sold on a securities exchange during a comparable period of time.”
 
Because the
Funds have not yet commenced operations, information on specific brokerage
transactions or commission costs is not included in this SAI.
 
44




 
DESCRIPTION
OF THE TRUST
 
The Trust’s Declaration of
Trust permits the Trustees to issue an unlimited number of full and fractional
shares of each series. Each share of each Fund represents an equal
proportionate interest in such Fund with each other share of that Fund and is
entitled to a proportionate interest in the dividends and distributions from
that Fund. The Declaration of Trust further permits the Board of Trustees to
divide the shares of each series into any number of separate classes, each
having such rights and preferences relative to other classes of the same series
as the Board of Trustees may determine. When you invest in a Fund, you acquire
freely transferable shares of beneficial interest that entitle you to receive
dividends as determined by the Board of Trustees and to cast a vote for each
share you own at shareholder meetings. The shares of each Fund do not have any
preemptive rights. Upon termination of any Fund, whether pursuant to
liquidation of the Trust or otherwise, shareholders of each class of that Fund
are entitled to share pro rata in the net assets attributable to that class of
shares of that Fund available for distribution to shareholders. The Declaration
of Trust also permits the Board of Trustees to charge shareholders directly for
custodial, transfer agency, and servicing expenses.
 
Shares of each Fund are
currently divided into three classes, designated Class A, Class C and
Class I Shares.
 
The assets received by each
class of a Fund for the issue or sale of its shares and all income, earnings,
profits, losses and proceeds therefrom, subject only to the rights of
creditors, are allocated to, and constitute the underlying assets of, that
class of the Fund. The underlying assets of each class of a Fund are segregated
and are charged with the expenses with respect to that class of the Fund and
with a share of the general expenses of the relevant Fund and Trust. Any
general expenses of the Trust that are not readily identifiable as belonging to
a particular class of a Fund are allocated by or under the direction of the
Trustees in such manner as the Trustees determine to be fair and equitable.
While the expenses of the Trust are allocated to the separate books of account
of each Fund, certain expenses may be legally chargeable against the assets of
all of the Funds in a Trust.
 
The Declaration of Trust
also permits the Board of Trustees, without shareholder approval, to subdivide
any Fund or series or class of shares into various sub-series or sub-classes
with such dividend preferences and other rights as the Trustees may designate.
The Board of Trustees may also, without shareholder approval, establish one or more
additional series or classes or merge two or more existing series or classes
without shareholder approval. Shareholders’ investments in such an additional
or merged series would be evidenced by a separate series of shares (i.e., a new “Fund”).
 
The Declaration of Trust
provides for the perpetual existence of the Trust.  The Trust or any Fund, however, may be
terminated at any time by vote of at least two thirds of the outstanding shares
of each Fund affected. Similarly, any class within a Fund may be terminated by
vote of at least two thirds of the outstanding shares of such class. The
Declaration of Trust further provides that the Board of Trustees may also
without shareholder approval terminate the relevant Trust or Fund upon written
notice to its shareholders.
 
Voting
Rights. Shareholders of all
Funds are entitled to one vote for each full share held (with fractional votes
for each fractional share held)
and may vote (to the extent provided therein) on the election of Trustees and
the termination of the Trust and on other matters submitted to the vote of
shareholders.
 
All classes of shares of the
Funds have identical voting rights except that each class of shares has
exclusive voting rights on any matter submitted to shareholders that relates
solely to that class, and has separate voting rights on any matter submitted to
shareholders in which the interests of one class differ from the interests of
any other class. Each class of shares has exclusive voting rights with respect
to matters pertaining to any distribution or servicing plan or agreement
applicable to that class. Matters submitted to shareholder vote will be
approved by each series separately except (i) when required by the 1940
Act, shares shall be voted together and (ii) when the matter does not
affect all series, then only shareholders of the series affected shall be
entitled to vote on the matter. Consistent with the current position of the
SEC, shareholders of all series and classes vote together, irrespective of
series or class, on the election of Trustees and the selection of the Trust’s
independent registered public accounting firm, but shareholders of each series
vote separately on most other matters requiring shareholder approval, such as
certain changes in investment policies of that series or the approval of the
investment advisory and any subadvisory agreement relating to that series, and
shareholders of each class within a series vote separately as to the Rule 12b-1
plan (if any) relating to that class.
 
There will normally be no
meetings of shareholders for the purpose of electing Trustees, except that, in
accordance with the 1940 Act, (i) a Trust will hold a shareholders’
meeting for the election of Trustees at such time as less than a majority of
the Trustees holding office have been elected by shareholders, and (ii) if
there is a vacancy on the Board of Trustees, such vacancy may be filled only by
a vote of the shareholders unless, after filling such vacancy by other means,
at least two-thirds of the Trustees holding office shall have been elected by
the shareholders. In addition, Trustees may be removed from office 
 
45




 
by a written consent signed
by the holders of two-thirds of the outstanding shares and filed with a Trust’s
custodian or by a vote of the holders of two-thirds of the outstanding shares
at a meeting duly called for that purpose.
 
Except as set forth above,
the Trustees shall continue to hold office and may appoint successor Trustees.
Shareholder voting rights are not cumulative.
 
The affirmative vote of a
majority of shares of the Trust voted (assuming a quorum is present in person
or by proxy) is required to amend the Declaration of Trust if such amendment (1) affects
the power of shareholders to vote, (2) amends the section of the relevant
Declaration of Trust governing amendments, (3) is one for which a vote is
required by law or by the Trust’s registration statement or (4) is
submitted to the shareholders by the Trustees. If one or more new series of a
Trust is established and designated by the Trustees, the shareholders having
beneficial interests in the Funds shall not be entitled to vote on matters
exclusively affecting such new series, such matters including, without
limitation, the adoption of or any change in the investment objectives,
policies or restrictions of the new series and the approval of the investment
advisory contracts of the new series. Similarly, the shareholders of the new
series shall not be entitled to vote on any such matters as they affect the other
Funds.
 
Shareholder
and Trustee Liability. Under
Massachusetts law, shareholders could, under certain circumstances, be held
personally liable for the obligations
of the Trust. However, the Declaration of Trust disclaims shareholder liability
for acts or obligations of the Trust and requires that notice of such
disclaimer be given in each agreement, obligation or instrument entered into or
executed by the Trust or the Trustees. The Declaration of Trust provides for
indemnification out of each Fund’s property for all loss and expense of any
shareholder held personally liable for the obligations of the Fund by reason of
owning shares of such Fund. Thus, the risk of a shareholder incurring financial
loss on account of shareholder liability is considered remote since it is
limited to circumstances in which the disclaimer is inoperative and a Fund
itself would be unable to meet its obligations.
 
The Declaration of Trust
further provides that the Board of Trustees will not be liable for errors of
judgment or mistakes of fact or law. However, nothing in the Declaration of
Trust protects a Trustee against any liability to which the Trustee would
otherwise be subject by reason of willful misfeasance, bad faith, gross
negligence or reckless disregard of the duties involved in the conduct of his
or her office. The Declaration of Trust of the Trust provides for
indemnification by the Trust of Trustees and officers of the Trust, except with
respect to any matter as to which any such person did not act in good faith in
the reasonable belief that his or her action was in the best interests of the
Trust. Such persons may not be indemnified against any liability to the Trust
or the Trust’s shareholders to whom he or she would otherwise be subject by
reason of willful misfeasance, bad faith, gross negligence or reckless
disregard of the duties involved in the conduct of his or her office.
 
46




 
OTHER
INFORMATION ABOUT THE FUNDS
 
Custodian
 
State Street
Bank and Trust Company (the “Custodian”), located at 200 Newport Avenue North
Quincy, MA 02171, serves as the custodian for the Funds. As such, the Custodian
holds in safekeeping certificated securities and cash belonging to each Fund
and, in such capacity, is the registered owner of securities in book-entry form
belonging to each Fund. Upon instruction, the Custodian receives and delivers
cash and securities of each Fund in connection with Fund transactions and
collects all dividends and other distributions made with respect to Fund
portfolio securities. The Custodian also maintains certain accounts and records
of the Funds and calculates the total net asset value, total net income and net
asset value per share of each Fund on a daily basis.  
 
Counsel
 
Ropes &
Gray LLP serves as counsel to the Funds, and is located at 1211 Avenue of the
Americas, New York, NY, 10036.
 
Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm 
 
Ernst & Young LLP serves as each
Fund’s independent registered public accountant.  Ernst & Young LLP provides audit services,
tax return preparation and assistance and consultation in connection with
review of SEC filings.  Ernst &
Young LLP is located at 200 Clarendon Street Boston MA, 02116-5072. 
 
The financial statements of the Funds
included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus and SAI have been
audited by Ernst & Young LLP, an independent registered public accounting
firm, as stated in their report which is also included or incorporated by
reference in the Prospectus and SAI, and have been so included or incorporated
by reference in reliance upon the report of such firm, given on the authority
of that firm as experts in accounting and auditing.  
 
Administrator 
 
State Street
Bank and Trust Company (the “Administrator”) serves as administrator to the
Trust. As such, the Administrator provides various fund administration
services, including the preparation of certain financial information, the
coordination of audits of financial statements, and coordination of various
filings. The services provided by the Administrator are enumerated in Exhibit
99(h)(1) to this filing.  
 
47




 
Report of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm 
 
To the Shareholder and Board of Trustees of 
IVA Fiduciary Trust 
 
We have audited the accompanying statement of assets and liabilities of
IVA Worldwide Fund, a series of IVA Fiduciary Trust (the “Trust”), as of
August 20, 2008. This statement of assets and liabilities is the
responsibility of the Trust’s management. 
Our responsibility is to express an opinion on this statement of assets
and liabilities based on our audit. 
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the Public
Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States).  Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of
assets and liabilities is free of material misstatement.  We were not engaged to perform an audit of
the Trust’s internal control over financial reporting.  Our audit included consideration of internal
control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that
are appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an
opinion on the effectiveness of the Trust’s internal control over financial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion. An audit also includes examining, on a test basis, evidence
supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of assets and
liabilities, assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates
made by management, and evaluating the overall statement of assets and
liabilities presentation.  We believe
that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion. 
 
In our opinion, the statement of assets and liabilities referred to
above presents fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of IVA
Worldwide Fund, a series of IVA Fiduciary Trust at August 20, 2008, in
conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. 
 
 

 
 
Boston, Massachusetts 
September 4, 2008 
 
48




 
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 
IVA Funds  
Statement of Assets and Liabilities  
August 20, 2008  
 



 


 


IVA


 




 


 


Worldwide


 




 


 


Fund


 




ASSETS


 


 


 




Cash


 


$


120,000.00


 




 


 


$


120,000.00


 




 


 


 


 




LIABILITIES


 


$


0.00


 




 


 


 


 




NET ASSETS


 


$


120,000.00


 




 


 


 


 




NET ASSETS CONSIST OF:


 


 


 




Paid-in Capital


 


$


120,000.00


 




 


 


 


 




CLASS I SHARES:


 


 


 




NET ASSETS


 


$


120,000.00


 




Shares issued and outstanding ($0.001 par value
  common stock outstanding)*


 


10,000.000


 




 


 


 


 




NET ASSET VALUE PER SHARE


 


$


12.00


 



 

*Unlimited
number of shares are authorized.  
 
See
accompanying Notes to Statement of Assets and Liabilities.  
 
49






 
IVA
Funds  
Notes
to Statement of Assets and Liabilities  
August
20, 2008  
 
1.              Organization  
 
IVA Worldwide Fund, or the Fund, is a diversified series of IVA
Fiduciary Trust, or the Trust, which was organized as a Massachusetts business
trust on June 12, 2008, and is registered under the Investment Company Act
of 1940, as amended, as an open end management investment company.  The Fund’s investment objective is to seek
long-term growth of capital by investing in a range of securities and asset
classes from markets around the world, including U.S. markets.  The Fund has no operations to date, other
than matters relating to the Fund’s establishment, registration of the Fund’s
shares under the Securities Act of 1933, and the sale of a total of 10,000 Class I
shares for $120,000 to Charles de Vaulx.  
 
The Fund offers multiple classes of shares which provide investors with
different purchase options.  Class A
shares are offered to investors subject to an initial sales charge.  Class C shares are offered to investors
without an initial sales charge and are subject to higher ongoing expenses than
Class A shares and a contingent deferred sales charge payable upon certain
redemptions within one year of purchase. 
Class I shares are offered to a limited group of investors, are not
subject to initial or contingent deferred sales charges and have lower ongoing
expenses than other classes.  
 
2.              Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies  
 
Use of Estimates.  Preparation of
this financial statement in conformity with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States requires the Fund’s management to make estimates
and assumptions that may affect the amounts reported in the financial statement
and related notes.  The actual results
could differ from these estimates.  
 
Class Allocation. 
Investment income, realized and unrealized gains and losses, and certain
Fund-level expenses and expense reductions, if any, are borne pro rata on the
basis of relative net assets by the holders of all classes of shares, except
that each class bears certain expenses unique to that class.  Differences in class-level expenses may
result in payment of different per share dividends by share class.  All shares of the Fund have equal rights with
respect to voting subject to class-specific arrangements.  
 
Redemption Fees.  The Fund
imposes a redemption fee of 2% of the total redemption amount on the Fund
shares redeemed within 30 days of buying them. 
The purpose of the redemption fees is to deter excessive, short-term
trading and other abusive trading practices, and to help offset the costs
associated with the sale of portfolio securities to satisfy redemption and
exchange requests made by “market timers” and other short-term shareholders,
thereby insulating longer-term shareholders from such costs.  
 
50




 
3.              Advisory Agreement and
Administration Agreements  
 
The Fund has an advisory agreement with International Value Advisers,
LLC (the “Adviser”) to provide the Fund with a continuous investment program,
to make day-to-day investment decisions and to generally manage the business
affairs of the Fund in accordance with its investment objectives and
policies.  Pursuant to the agreement,
upon commencement of investment operations, the Adviser will be compensated at
an annual rate of 0.90% of the Fund’s average daily net assets.  
 
The Fund entered into an expense limitation agreement with the Adviser,
until September 30, 2009.  Under the
expense limitation agreement, the Adviser has agreed to waive or limit its fees
and to assume other expenses so that the total expenses for Class A, Class C
or Class I shares are limited to 1.40%, 2.15% and 1.15%, respectively, of
average daily net assets.  The Fund may
later reimburse the Adviser for the management fees waived or limited and other
expenses assumed and paid by the Adviser under the expense limitation agreement
provided the Fund reaches sufficient asset size to permit such
reimbursement.  The Adviser may recoup
all or a portion of any waived investment advisory fees and expenses it has
borne, if any, to the extent a class’s expenses fall below the maximum ratio
within one year after the end of the fiscal year in which the waiver was made.  
 
4.              Distribution and Shareholder
Services Plans  
 
The Trust has adopted a distribution plan with respect to the Fund’s Class A
and Class C shares pursuant to Rule 12b-1 under the Investment
Company Act of 1940, as amended, or the Act, which allows the Fund to pay
distribution fees for the sale and distribution of its shares.  Under this plan, the Fund may pay a
distribution fee at an annual rate of up to 0.25% of the average daily value of
the Fund’s net assets attributable to the Class A shares and 0.75% of the
average daily value of the Fund’s net assets attributable to the Class C
shares.  
 
The Trust has adopted a shareholder services plan with respect to the
Fund’s Class C shares pursuant to Rule 12b-1 under the Act, which
provides that the Fund may obtain the services of qualified financial
institutions to act as shareholder servicing agents for their customers.  For these services, the Fund may pay the
shareholder servicing agent a fee at an annual rate of up to 0.25% of the
average daily net asset value of the Fund’s Class C shares.  
 
5.              Organizational Expenses and
Offering Costs  
 
The Adviser has agreed to pay all organizational expenses which are
estimated to be $155,750.  
 
6.              Federal Income Taxes  
 
The Fund intends to qualify as a “regulated investment company” and to
comply with the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, such that it will generally not be subject to Federal income tax.  
 
51




 
APPENDIX A  
 
PROXY VOTING POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES  
 
The Board of Trustees of the
Funds has delegated the authority to develop policies and procedures relating
to proxy voting to the Adviser.  The
Adviser has adopted a set of proxy voting policies and procedures (the “Policies”)
to ensure that the Adviser votes proxies relating to equity securities in the
best interest of clients.  
 
In voting proxies, the
Adviser is guided by general fiduciary principles and seeks to act prudently
and solely in the best interest of clients. 
The Adviser attempts to consider all factors that could affect the value
of the investment and will vote proxies in the manner that it believes will be
consistent with efforts to maximize shareholder values.  The Adviser may utilize an external service
provider to provide it with information and/or a recommendation with regard to
proxy votes.  However, such
recommendations do not relieve the Adviser of its responsibility for the proxy
vote.  
 
In the case of a proxy issue
for which there is a stated position in the Policies, the Adviser generally
votes in accordance with such stated position. 
In the case of a proxy issue for which there is a list of factors set
forth in the Policies that the Adviser considers in voting on such issue, the
Adviser votes on a case-by-case basis in accordance with the general principles
set forth above and considering such enumerated factors.  In the case of a proxy issue for which there
is no stated position or list of factors that the Adviser considers in voting
on such issue, the Adviser votes on a case-by-case basis in accordance with the
general principles set forth above. 
Issues for which there is a stated position set forth in the Policies or
for which there is a list of factors set forth in the Policies that the Adviser
considers in voting on such issues fall into a variety of categories, including
election of trustees, ratification of auditors, proxy and tender offer
defenses, capital structure issues, executive and trustee compensation, mergers
and corporate restructurings, and social and environmental issues.  The stated position on an issue set forth in
the Policies can always be superseded, subject to the duty to act solely in the
best interest of the beneficial owners of accounts, by the investment
management professionals responsible for the account whose shares are being
voted.  Issues applicable to a particular
industry may cause the Adviser to abandon a policy that would have otherwise
applied to issuers generally.  The
Adviser’s policy is to vote all proxies from a specific issuer in the same way
for each client absent qualifying restrictions from the client.  
 
In furtherance of the
Adviser’s goal to vote proxies in the best interest of clients, the Adviser
follows procedures designed to identify and address material conflicts that may
arise between the Adviser’s interests and those of its clients before voting
proxies on behalf of such clients.  To
seek to identify conflicts of interest, the Adviser reviews its relationship
with the issuer of each security to determine if the Adviser or any of its
employees has any financial, business or personal relationship with the issuer.
The Adviser is also sensitive to the fact that a significant, publicized
relationship between an issuer and a non- affiliate might appear to the public
to influence the manner in which the Adviser decides to vote a proxy with
respect to such issuer.  
 
The Adviser’s CCO reviews
and addresses conflicts of interest brought to her attention.  A proxy issue that will be voted in
accordance with a stated position on an issue or in accordance with the
recommendation of an independent third party is not brought to the attention of
the CCO for a conflict of interest review because the Adviser’s position is
that to the extent a conflict of interest issue exists, it is resolved by
voting in accordance with a pre-determined policy or in accordance with the
recommendation of an independent third party. 
With respect to a conflict of interest brought to its attention, the CCO
first determines whether such conflict of interest is material.  A conflict of interest is considered material
to the extent that it is determined that such conflict is likely to influence,
or appear to influence, the Adviser’s decision-making in voting proxies.  
 
If it is determined by the
CCO that a conflict of interest is not material, the Adviser may vote proxies
notwithstanding the existence of the conflict. 
If it is determined by the CCO that a conflict of interest is material,
the CCO is responsible for determining an appropriate method to resolve such
conflict of interest before the proxy affected by the conflict of interest is
voted.  Such determination is based on
the particular facts and circumstances, including the importance of the proxy
issue and the nature of the conflict of interest.  Methods of resolving a material conflict of
interest may include, but are not limited to, disclosing the conflict to
clients and obtaining their consent before voting, or suggesting to clients
that they engage another party to vote the proxy on their behalf. 
 
A-1



R-->Dates Referenced Herein   and   Documents Incorporated by Reference
This ‘497’ Filing    Date    Other Filings1/1/11485BPOS12/31/10N-Q9/30/0924F-2NT,  N-CSR,  NSAR-B10/1/08Filed on / Effective on:9/26/089/4/089/2/088/21/088/20/086/12/081/1/08 List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0001104659-08-060753   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Sat, 29 Jul 05:47:24.2 GMT 





Mutual Funds | IVA Funds


































Home



U.S. Investors



Mutual Funds


IVA Worldwide Fund


IVA International Fund


Order Materials


Fund Documents


Shareholder Login





Separate Accounts


IVA Diversified Global Strategy


IVA Diversified International Strategy


Client Login





Commingled Vehicles


Global Delaware


Overseas Cayman


Overseas Delaware





Financial Advisers


Participating Firms


Client Service Contact Details


Breakpoint Table


Order Materials


Fund Literature Archive


DST Vision Login







Non-U.S. Investors



IVA Global SICAV I


IVA Global SICAV I


Key Investor Information Document (KIID)


Order Materials





Commingled Vehicles


Overseas Cayman







About


About IVA


Our Team


Strategy and Investment Approach


An Owner's Manual


Careers





News


Recent News & Updates


News Archive




Events


Contact Us





LinkedIn
Go To My Account


International Value Advisers 







U.S. Investors



Mutual Funds


IVA Worldwide Fund


IVA International Fund


Order Materials


Fund Documents


Shareholder Login





Separate Accounts


IVA Diversified Global Strategy


IVA Diversified International Strategy


Client Login




Commingled Vehicles


Financial Advisers





Non-U.S. Investors



IVA Global SICAV I


Commingled Vehicles





About


About IVA


Our Team


Strategy and Investment Approach


An Owner's Manual


Careers





News


Recent News & Updates


News Archive




Events


Contact Us



















Mutual Funds


IVA Worldwide Fund


IVA International Fund


Order Materials


Fund Documents


Shareholder Login




Separate Accounts


IVA Diversified Global Strategy


IVA Diversified International Strategy


Your SMA Report




Commingled Vehicles


Global Delaware


Overseas Cayman


Overseas Delaware




Financial Advisers


Participating Firms


Client Service Contact Details


Breakpoint Table


Order Materials


Fund Literature Archive


DST Vision Login






Manager Insights


Jun 2017

Active Management at IVA: A Focus on Clients’ True Investment Goals


We outline our views on passive management and demonstrate the continued importance of investments that are properly aligned with shareholders' goals. Click here to read the newsletter.



May 2017

Morningstar Analyst Report on the IVA Worldwide Fund, “Caution is the watchword.”


Click here to read the Morningstar Analyst Report on the IVA Worldwide Fund from May 15, 2017, "Caution is the Word".



May 2017

Advisor Perspectives- ”The Best Fund Managers- As Voted by their Peers”


Click here to read the full article.



Jan 2017

Charles de Vaulx’s interview with Consuelo Mack appeared on Wealth Track on Friday, January 20.


Click here to watch the interview.


*As discussed in the interview, the IVA Worldwide Fund is classified as part of the Morningstar World Allocation group.




More →



Subscribe to Updates
Sign-up for periodic updates on our Insights, Performance and other information. Registration is for Investment Professionals only.
Sign-up





×
Subscribe to Updates



First Name








Last Name








Email











 I am a Registered Investment Advisor 
							    








Close
Sign-up










Mutual Funds


IVA Worldwide Fund
IVA International Fund
Financial Advisers Login or Register
Shareholder Login
Cost Basis Solution

Fund Data


IVA Worldwide Fund



Class
Ticker

CUSIP




A
IVWAX

45070A107


C
IVWCX

45070A503


I
IVWIX

45070A206





IVA International Fund



Class
Ticker

CUSIP




A
IVIOX

45070A305


C
IVICX

45070A602


I
IVIQX

45070A404





eDelivery
Direct Shareholders:
IVA Funds is pleased to offer the convenience of viewing account statements, confirmations, prospectuses, and annual/semi-annual reports online.
If you would like to make this electronic delivery election, which can be changed at any time, please update your delivery preferences online here within the account services menu once you are logged into the mutual fund shareholder page.
Brokerage Account Shareholders:
As a brokerage account shareholder you receive statements directly from your bank or broker. If you would like to sign up for eDelivery, please go to the .com website of icsdelivery. By copying/pasting this option into your browser, you will be leaving this site and entering a broker/financial institution website hosted by Broadridge in order to enroll in eDelivery. These details have been provided as a convenience and we disclaim any responsibility for information, services or products found on websites linked hereto.
How to Invest
By Telephone:

(877) 874-2999 (Mutual Fund Sales Desk)
(866) 941-4482 (Investor Services)

By Mail:
Click here to download an application from our website and mail to:
Regular Mail:
IVA Funds
P.O. Box 8077
Boston, MA 02266-8077
Express, Certified or Registered Mail:
IVA Funds
c/o Boston Financial Data Services, Inc.
30 Dan Road
Canton, MA 02021 
An investor should read and consider the fund’s investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing. This and other important information are detailed in our prospectus and summary prospectus which can be obtained by calling (866) 941-4482 or download a copy directly from our website. Please read the prospectus and summary prospectus carefully before you invest. The IVA Funds are offered by IVA Funds Distributors, LLC





There are risks associated with investing in mutual funds that invest in securities of foreign countries, such as erratic market conditions, economic and political instability and fluctuations in currency exchange rates. Value-based investments are subject to the risk that the broad market may not recognize their intrinsic value.
An investor should read and consider the funds' investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses carefully before investing in the IVA International Fund or IVA Worldwide Fund. This and other important information are detailed in our prospectus and summary prospectus, which can be obtained by calling (866) 941-4482 or visiting www.ivafunds.com. Please read the prospectus and summary prospectus carefully before you invest. The IVA Funds are offered by IVA Funds Distributors, LLC.
Any statistics contained herein have been obtained from sources believed to be reliable, but the accuracy of this information cannot be guaranteed.   






U.S. Investors

Mutual Funds

IVA Worldwide Fund
IVA International Fund
Order Materials
Fund Documents
Shareholder Login


Separate Accounts

IVA Diversified Global Strategy
IVA Diversified International Strategy
Client Login


Commingled Vehicles
Financial Advisers



Non-U.S. Investors

IVA Global SICAV I
Commingled Vehicles



About

About IVA
Our Team
Strategy and Investment Approach
An Owner's Manual
Careers



News

Recent News & Updates
News Archive



Events


Support

Sitemap
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use

Contact
Email Us
(877) 874-2999






FINRA's BrokerCheck  LinkedIn






© 2015 International Value Advisers, LLC. All rights reserved.




 
















Iva Fiduciary Trust in New York, New York with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeNew York, NYIva Fiduciary TrustNew York, NY Iva Fiduciary TrustAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection1. Fiduciary Trust Co Intl280 Park AveNew York, NY 10017(212) 632-3000Trust CompaniesInvestmentsWebsiteFrom Business: Fiduciary Trust Company International is a subsidiary of Franklin Resources, a global investment management organization. It manages investments and provides pens…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection2. Fiduciary Trust Co International600 5th AveNew York, NY 10020(212) 632-3000Trust CompaniesWebsiteServicesMake an AppointmentAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection3. Fiduciary & Trust AssociatesServing the New York Area.(212) 629-1854Financing ConsultantsWebsiteFrom Business: We are a Swiss fiduciary providing comprehensive services within account opening, credit cards, investment opportunities and company incorporations in Switzerland…Businesses in related categories to Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection4. Agva Welfare Trust Fund363 7th Ave Fl 17New York, NY 10001(212) 627-4820Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection5. Amicorp Services LTD45 Rockefeller PlzNew York, NY 10111(212) 752-3079Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection6. First Republic Bank320 Park Ave Frnt 3New York, NY 10022(212) 486-8882BanksFinancial Planning ConsultantsWebsiteFrom Business: Our goal is to change the way you feel about banking. Our customers enjoy a level of personal service that is rare in banking these days and the peace of mind tha…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection7. Burnham Hill Capitol650 5th AveNew York, NY 10019(212) 980-9700BanksCredit UnionsHolding CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection8. Norwest Bank Corporate Trust Services3 New York PlzNew York, NY 10004(212) 515-5240Commercial & Savings BanksBanksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection9. Trendman Trust466 Lexington AveNew York, NY 10017(212) 551-1788Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection10. Nysa Ila Pension Trust77 Water St Ste 1601New York, NY 10005(212) 898-9140Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection11. Blenheim Capital Management712 5th AveNew York, NY 10019(212) 247-7376Investment ManagementWebsiteMake an AppointmentAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection12. Law Offices of Fred Vanremortal - CLOSED1350 Avenue Of The AmericasNew York, NY 10019AttorneysCriminal Law AttorneysWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection13. Fmg304 Park Ave S Fl 5New York, NY 10010(212) 590-2359Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection14. Atlantic Trust Private Wealth Management50 Rockefeller PlzNew York, NY 10020(212) 259-3800Trust CompaniesWebsiteFrom Business: Atlantic Trust Private Wealth Management is a financial advisement company that manages more than $16 billion for select individuals, families, foundations and in…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection15. Costello, Timothy M Costello & Arslanian260 Madison AveNew York, NY 10016(212) 755-4321AttorneysWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection16. Us Trustee33 Whitehall St Ste 2200New York, NY 10004(212) 510-0500Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection17. Delta National Bank And Trust Company650 5th Ave Fl 26New York, NY 10019(212) 315-3131Trust CompaniesFinancial PlannersWebsiteFrom Business: Delta National Bank and Trust Company, with assets of more than $2 billion, is a chartered financial institution that provides service to high net worth individua…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection18. M Bradford Randolph ESQ PLLCBBB Rating: A+45 Rockefeller Plz Fl 20New York, NY 10111(212) 759-0097AttorneysGeneral Practice AttorneysWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection19. Paul & Daisy Soros Fellowship224 W 57th StNew York, NY 10019(212) 547-6927Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection20. Nysa Ila Funds45 BroadwayNew York, NY 10006(212) 208-0220Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection21. Afl-Cio Housing Invstmnt Trust224 W 18th StNew York, NY 10011(202) 331-8055Trust CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection22. Asia E Commerce Limited420 Lexington AveNew York, NY 10170(212) 931-6348Trust CompaniesFinancial ServicesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection23. Winthrop Trust Co466 Lexington AveNew York, NY 10017(212) 201-4172Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection24. Waitzkin Memorial Art Trust150 W 28th StNew York, NY 10001(212) 675-4960Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection25. Ambase Corporation59 Maiden LnNew York, NY 10038(212) 530-6800Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection26. Cambridge International Partners Inc780 3rd Ave Rm 2501New York, NY 10017(212) 826-8290BanksCredit UnionsHolding CompaniesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection27. Bank-Foreign Economic Affairs777 3rd Ave Fl 2901New York, NY 10017(212) 421-8660Commercial & Savings BanksCredit UnionsMake an AppointmentAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection28. Anchor Savings Bank99 Park AveNew York, NY 10016(212) 577-3140Commercial & Savings BanksCredit UnionsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection29. Jtp-Fifth Column421 7th Ave Ste 900New York, NY 10001(212) 695-1335Trust CompaniesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection30. Highgrove Capital LTD55 E 59th St # 22New York, NY 10022(212) 308-0300BanksCredit UnionsHolding CompaniesWebsiteSponsored LinksMap ViewSponsoredDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glass 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback
